4274 | damage (noun): a change for the worse, harm done | loc: Schaden
  EN TS: Just a "little" damage.
  de TS: Nur ein „kleiner“ Schaden.
  EN FS: Just a "little" snow.
  de FS: Nur ein „bisschen“ Schnee.
  EN TP: damage to a parked car
  de TP: Schaden an einem geparkten Auto
  EN FP: damage to a bicycle
  de FP: Schaden an einem Fahrrad
4275 | complain (verb): to express displeasure or unhappiness | loc: sich beschweren
  EN TS: She is complaining about the car.
  de TS: Sie beschwert sich über das Auto.
  EN FS: She is complaining about the bike.
  de FS: Sie beschwert sich über das Fahrrad.
  EN TP: to complain about a crash
  de TP: sich über einen Unfall beschweren
  EN FP: to complain about the food
  de FP: sich über das Essen beschweren
4276 | elderly (adjective): advanced in years, old | loc: betagt
  EN TS: An elderly lady is going home.
  de TS: Eine betagte Dame geht nach Hause.
  EN FS: An elderly man is going home.
  de FS: Ein betagter Mann geht nach Hause.
  EN TP: an elderly woman walking
  de TP: eine betagte Frau beim Spazieren
  EN FP: an elderly woman dancing
  de FP: eine betagte Frau beim Tanzen
4277 | accountant (noun): someone who keeps and checks business accounts | loc: Buchhalter
  EN TS: The accountant found it!
  de TS: Der Buchhalter hat es gefunden!
  EN FS: The accountant lost it!
  de FS: Der Buchhalter hat es verloren!
  EN TP: an accountant with receipts
  de TP: ein Buchhalter mit Belegen
  EN FP: an accountant on holiday
  de FP: ein Buchhalter im Urlaub
4279 | theatre (noun): a building where plays or films are shown | loc: Theater
  EN TS: Nobody came to the theatre!
  de TS: Niemand kam ins Theater!
  EN FS: Nobody came to the stadium!
  de FS: Niemand kam ins Stadion!
  EN TP: a theatre stage
  de TP: eine Theaterbühne
  EN FP: a theatre ticket
  de FP: eine Theaterkarte
4280 | filming (noun): the act of making a film | loc: Dreharbeiten
  EN TS: Filming day: she is in tears.
  de TS: Dreharbeiten: Sie ist in Tränen aufgelöst.
  EN FS: Filming day: she is laughing.
  de FS: Dreharbeiten: Sie lacht sich kaputt.
  EN TP: filming a sad scene
  de TP: Dreharbeiten für eine traurige Szene
  EN FP: filming a cooking show
  de FP: Dreharbeiten für eine Kochshow
4281 | change (noun): when something passes from one state to another | loc: Veränderung
  EN TS: The colour change is amazing.
  de TS: Die Veränderung der Farbe ist der Wahnsinn.
  EN FS: The size change is amazing.
  de FS: Die Veränderung der Größe ist der Wahnsinn.
  EN TP: a change of colour
  de TP: eine Veränderung der Farbe
  EN FP: a change of clothes
  de FP: ein Wechsel der Kleidung
4282 | shelter (noun): a place that cares for animals with no home | loc: Tierheim
  EN TS: They got a dog from a shelter.
  de TS: Sie haben einen Hund aus dem Tierheim geholt.
  EN FS: They got a cat from a shelter.
  de FS: Sie haben eine Katze aus dem Tierheim geholt.
  EN TP: a dog from a shelter
  de TP: ein Hund aus dem Tierheim
  EN FP: a shelter from the rain
  de FP: Schutz vor dem Regen
4283 | cooking (noun): preparing food with heat | loc: Kochen
  EN TS: Her cooking gets applause!
  de TS: Für ihr Kochen gibt's Applaus!
  EN FS: Her singing gets applause!
  de FS: Für ihr Singen gibt's Applaus!
  EN TP: a cooking class
  de TP: ein Kochkurs
  EN FP: a cooking contest
  de FP: ein Kochwettbewerb
4284 | rush (noun): the act of moving hurriedly and carelessly | loc: Eile
  EN TS: He is leaving in a rush!
  de TS: Er haut in aller Eile ab!
  EN FS: He is leaving in a car!
  de FS: Er haut im Auto ab!
  EN TP: a morning rush
  de TP: die morgendliche Eile
  EN FP: a rush hour
  de FP: die Rushhour
4286 | fan (verb): to move the air with something, like a fan | loc: fächeln
  EN TS: She is fanning herself.
  de TS: Sie fächelt sich Luft zu.
  EN FS: She is fanning the cat.
  de FS: Sie fächelt der Katze Luft zu.
  EN TP: fanning herself in the heat
  de TP: sich bei Hitze Luft fächeln
  EN FP: fanning a barbecue fire
  de FP: einem Grillfeuer Luft fächeln
4287 | view (verb): to look at something carefully | loc: betrachten
  EN TS: They are viewing the flat.
  de TS: Sie betrachten die Wohnung.
  EN FS: They are viewing the car.
  de FS: Sie betrachten das Auto.
  EN TP: viewing an empty flat
  de TP: eine leere Wohnung betrachten
  EN FP: viewing a used car
  de FP: einen Gebrauchtwagen betrachten
4288 | target (noun): a point or object to shoot at | loc: Zielscheibe
  EN TS: She is focusing on the target.
  de TS: Sie konzentriert sich auf die Zielscheibe.
  EN FS: She is focusing on the camera.
  de FS: Sie konzentriert sich auf die Kamera.
  EN TP: three round targets
  de TP: drei runde Zielscheiben
  EN FP: a target on a wall
  de FP: eine Zielscheibe an der Wand
4289 | cold (noun): the absence of heat | loc: Kälte
  EN TS: The cold is blowing her back!
  de TS: Die Kälte drückt sie zurück!
  EN FS: The heat is blowing her back!
  de FS: Die Hitze drückt sie zurück!
  EN TP: a blast of cold
  de TP: ein Schwall Kälte
  EN FP: a cold drink
  de FP: ein kaltes Getränk
4290 | cool (verb): to make something cool or cooler | loc: kühlen
  EN TS: Cold air is cooling him down.
  de TS: Kalte Luft kühlt ihn ab.
  EN FS: Cold beer is cooling him down.
  de FS: Kaltes Bier kühlt ihn ab.
  EN TP: cooling down under the vent
  de TP: sich unter der Lüftung abkühlen
  EN FP: cooling a drink with ice
  de FP: ein Getränk mit Eis kühlen
4291 | forehead (noun): the part of the face above the eyes | loc: Stirn
  EN TS: He is cooling his forehead. So hot!
  de TS: Er kühlt sich die Stirn. So heiß!
  EN FS: He is cooling his feet. So hot!
  de FS: Er kühlt sich die Füße. So heiß!
  EN TP: a glass on his forehead
  de TP: ein Glas an seiner Stirn
  EN FP: a kiss on the forehead
  de FP: ein Kuss auf die Stirn
4292 | breeze (noun): a slight, refreshing wind | loc: Brise
  EN TS: A breeze is moving her hair.
  de TS: Eine Brise bewegt ihr Haar.
  EN FS: A fan is moving her hair.
  de FS: Ein Ventilator bewegt ihr Haar.
  EN TP: a breeze in the meadow
  de TP: eine Brise auf der Wiese
  EN FP: a breeze by the sea
  de FP: eine Brise am Meer
4293 | jet (noun): an airplane powered by jet engines | loc: Jet
  EN TS: The jet is taking off!
  de TS: Der Jet hebt ab!
  EN FS: The jet is landing!
  de FS: Der Jet landet!
  EN TP: a jet taking off
  de TP: ein abhebender Jet
  EN FP: a jet of water
  de FP: ein Wasserstrahl
4294 | low (adverb): in a low position, near the ground | loc: tief
  EN TS: The plane is flying very low!
  de TS: Das Flugzeug fliegt echt tief!
  EN FS: The kite is flying very low!
  de FS: Der Drachen fliegt echt tief!
  EN TP: flying low over him
  de TP: tief über ihm fliegen
  EN FP: flying low over the sea
  de FP: tief über dem Meer fliegen
4295 | photograph (verb): to take a picture on film or a camera | loc: fotografieren
  EN TS: Look, he's photographing a plane!
  de TS: Schau, er fotografiert ein Flugzeug!
  EN FS: Look, he's photographing a camel!
  de FS: Schau, er fotografiert ein Kamel!
  EN TP: photographing a landing jet
  de TP: einen landenden Jet fotografieren
  EN FP: photographing the desert sand
  de FP: den Wüstensand fotografieren
4296 | signal (noun): a gesture or action that sends a message | loc: Signal
  EN TS: Raised wands send a signal.
  de TS: Erhobene Leuchtstäbe senden ein Signal.
  EN FS: Raised flags send a signal.
  de FS: Erhobene Flaggen senden ein Signal.
  EN TP: a signal to the pilot
  de TP: ein Signal an den Piloten
  EN FP: a weak phone signal
  de FP: ein schwaches Handysignal
4297 | departure (noun): the act of leaving, departing | loc: Abreise | checker: word_missing? | translator note: Abreise is unidiomatic for an airport departures board; used Abflug(tafel)
  EN TS: The departures board is huge!
  de TS: Die Abflugtafel ist riesig!
  EN FS: The arrivals board is huge!
  de FS: Die Ankunftstafel ist riesig!
  EN TP: a huge departures board
  de TP: eine riesige Abflugtafel
  EN FP: a departure by train
  de FP: eine Abreise mit dem Zug
4298 | straight (adverb): in a direct line, without deviation | loc: gerade
  EN TS: Boys are lining up straight.
  de TS: Jungs stellen sich gerade in einer Reihe auf.
  EN FS: Girls are lining up straight.
  de FS: Mädchen stellen sich gerade in einer Reihe auf.
  EN TP: lining up straight
  de TP: sich gerade aufstellen
  EN FP: going straight home
  de FP: geradewegs nach Hause gehen
4299 | react (verb): to show a response to something | loc: reagieren
  EN TS: He reacts to cats. Poor guy.
  de TS: Er reagiert auf Katzen. Der Arme.
  EN FS: He reacts to dogs. Poor guy.
  de FS: Er reagiert auf Hunde. Der Arme.
  EN TP: reacting to a cat
  de TP: auf eine Katze reagieren
  EN FP: reacting to bad news
  de FP: auf schlechte Nachrichten reagieren
4300 | rubbish (noun): worthless material to be thrown away | loc: Müll
  EN TS: Rubbish everywhere!
  de TS: Überall Müll!
  EN FS: Flowers everywhere!
  de FS: Überall Blumen!
  EN TP: bins heaped with rubbish
  de TP: Tonnen voller Müll
  EN FP: rubbish on a beach
  de FP: Müll am Strand
4301 | gap (noun): an empty space between things | loc: Lücke
  EN TS: He is squeezing through a gap.
  de TS: Er quetscht sich durch eine Lücke.
  EN FS: He is crawling through a gap.
  de FS: Er krabbelt durch eine Lücke.
  EN TP: squeezing through a narrow gap
  de TP: sich durch eine enge Lücke quetschen
  EN FP: a gap in the fence
  de FP: eine Lücke im Zaun
4302 | emergency (noun): a sudden crisis that needs immediate action | loc: Notfall
  EN TS: An emergency in the rain.
  de TS: Ein Notfall im Regen.
  EN FS: An emergency in the snow.
  de FS: Ein Notfall im Schnee.
  EN TP: an emergency at night
  de TP: ein Notfall in der Nacht
  EN FP: an emergency exit door
  de FP: eine Notausgangstür
4303 | medical (adjective): relating to medicine and doctors | loc: medizinisch
  EN TS: A medical team is crossing.
  de TS: Ein medizinisches Team überquert die Straße.
  EN FS: A police team is crossing.
  de FS: Ein Polizeiteam überquert die Straße.
  EN TP: a medical team crossing
  de TP: ein medizinisches Team beim Überqueren
  EN FP: a medical exam at school
  de FP: ein medizinischer Test in der Schule
4304 | football (noun): the oval ball used in American football | loc: Football
  EN TS: He threw the football, nice.
  de TS: Er hat den Football geworfen, stark.
  EN FS: He kicked the football, nice.
  de FS: Er hat den Football gekickt, stark.
  EN TP: an oval football mid-air
  de TP: ein ovaler Football in der Luft
  EN FP: a round football on grass
  de FP: ein runder Ball auf dem Rasen
4305 | boy (noun): a young male person | loc: der Junge
  EN TS: The boy got a huge burger.
  de TS: Der Junge hat einen riesigen Burger bekommen.
  EN FS: The boy got a huge pizza.
  de FS: Der Junge hat eine riesige Pizza bekommen.
  EN TP: a boy getting a burger
  de TP: ein Junge kriegt einen Burger
  EN FP: a boy cooking a burger
  de FP: ein Junge brät einen Burger
4306 | prison (noun): a place where persons are locked up for punishment | loc: Gefängnis
  EN TS: They are leaving prison!
  de TS: Sie verlassen das Gefängnis!
  EN FS: They are entering prison!
  de FS: Sie gehen ins Gefängnis!
  EN TP: leaving the prison
  de TP: das Gefängnis verlassen
  EN FP: visiting a prison
  de FP: ein Gefängnis besuchen
4307 | banner (noun): a long strip of cloth or paper with a message | loc: Banner
  EN TS: Four banners are waving above.
  de TS: Oben wehen vier Banner.
  EN FS: Two banners are waving above.
  de FS: Oben wehen zwei Banner.
  EN TP: banners above the stand
  de TP: Banner über der Tribüne
  EN FP: banners above the shop
  de FP: Banner über dem Laden
4308 | supporter (noun): a person who backs a team or politician | loc: Anhänger
  EN TS: These supporters never stop singing.
  de TS: Diese Anhänger hören nie auf zu singen.
  EN FS: These supporters never stop dancing.
  de FS: Diese Anhänger hören nie auf zu tanzen.
  EN TP: singing supporters
  de TP: singende Anhänger
  EN FP: sleeping supporters
  de FP: schlafende Anhänger
4309 | anthem (noun): a song of loyalty to a nation or school | loc: Hymne
  EN TS: The anthem is making her cry.
  de TS: Die Hymne bringt sie zum Weinen.
  EN FS: The goal is making her cry.
  de FS: Das Tor bringt sie zum Weinen.
  EN TP: singing the anthem
  de TP: die Hymne singen
  EN FP: writing the anthem
  de FP: die Hymne schreiben
4310 | emotional (adjective): showing strong feelings openly | loc: emotional
  EN TS: The emotional player is crying!
  de TS: Der emotionale Spieler weint!
  EN FS: The emotional player is laughing!
  de FS: Der emotionale Spieler lacht!
  EN TP: an emotional team song
  de TP: ein emotionales Teamlied
  EN FP: an emotional wedding song
  de FP: ein emotionales Hochzeitslied
4311 | young (adjective): in an early period of life | loc: jung
  EN TS: Even grandma plays with the young man.
  de TS: Sogar Oma spielt mit dem jungen Mann.
  EN FS: Even grandpa plays with the young man.
  de FS: Sogar Opa spielt mit dem jungen Mann.
  EN TP: a young basketball player
  de TP: ein junger Basketballspieler
  EN FP: a young tennis player
  de FP: ein junger Tennisspieler
4312 | loud (adjective): producing sound of great volume | loc: laut
  EN TS: He is loud, but nobody hears.
  de TS: Er ist laut, aber keiner hört's.
  EN FS: He is quiet, but nobody hears.
  de FS: Er ist leise, aber keiner hört's.
  EN TP: a loud call
  de TP: ein lauter Ruf
  EN FP: a loud party
  de FP: eine laute Party
4313 | pub (noun): a building with a bar where people drink | loc: Kneipe
  EN TS: The whole pub is singing!
  de TS: Die ganze Kneipe singt!
  EN FS: The whole pub is sleeping!
  de FS: Die ganze Kneipe pennt!
  EN TP: karaoke in a pub
  de TP: Karaoke in einer Kneipe
  EN FP: a pub quiz night
  de FP: ein Quizabend in der Kneipe
4314 | orange (noun): a round orange citrus fruit | loc: Orange
  EN TS: Four oranges are in the bowl.
  de TS: Vier Orangen liegen in der Schale.
  EN FS: Four apples are in the bowl.
  de FS: Vier Äpfel liegen in der Schale.
  EN TP: a bowl of oranges
  de TP: eine Schale Orangen
  EN FP: a glass of orange juice
  de FP: ein Glas Orangensaft
4315 | price (noun): the amount of money something is sold for | loc: Preis
  EN TS: The price keeps going up!
  de TS: Der Preis steigt und steigt!
  EN FS: The price keeps going down!
  de FS: Der Preis sinkt und sinkt!
  EN TP: the price of a flat
  de TP: der Preis einer Wohnung
  EN FP: the price of a car
  de FP: der Preis eines Autos
4316 | sorry (adjective): feeling regret over something you did | loc: reuig
  EN TS: He is sorry. Tulips will help.
  de TS: Er ist reuig. Tulpen werden helfen.
  EN FS: He is sorry. Roses will help.
  de FS: Er ist reuig. Rosen werden helfen.
  EN TP: sorry about the coffee
  de TP: reuig wegen des Kaffees
  EN FP: sorry about the cake
  de FP: reuig wegen des Kuchens
4317 | apologize (verb): to admit your faults and say sorry | loc: sich entschuldigen
  EN TS: He is apologizing with coffee.
  de TS: Er entschuldigt sich mit Kaffee.
  EN FS: He is apologizing with cake.
  de FS: Er entschuldigt sich mit Kuchen.
  EN TP: apologizing for a spill
  de TP: sich für Verschüttetes entschuldigen
  EN FP: apologizing for being late
  de FP: sich fürs Zuspätkommen entschuldigen
4318 | applause (noun): showing approval by clapping the hands | loc: Applaus
  EN TS: His applause is growing.
  de TS: Sein Applaus wird immer lauter.
  EN FS: His laughter is growing.
  de FS: Sein Lachen wird immer lauter.
  EN TP: applause for the performer
  de TP: Applaus für den Künstler
  EN FP: applause for the team
  de FP: Applaus für das Team
4319 | blend (verb): to combine things into one | loc: vermischen
  EN TS: The stripes are blending in.
  de TS: Die Streifen vermischen sich.
  EN FS: The stripes are growing wider.
  de FS: Die Streifen werden breiter.
  EN TP: blending cream into skin
  de TP: Creme auf der Haut vermischen
  EN FP: blending fruit in a mixer
  de FP: Obst im Mixer vermischen
4320 | plan (noun): a scale drawing of a building | loc: Bauplan
  EN TS: He is drawing a plan.
  de TS: Er zeichnet einen Bauplan.
  EN FS: He is drawing a face.
  de FS: Er zeichnet ein Gesicht.
  EN TP: drawing a house plan
  de TP: einen Bauplan fürs Haus zeichnen
  EN FP: making a holiday plan
  de FP: einen Urlaubsplan machen
4321 | model (noun): a representation of something, often smaller | loc: Modell
  EN TS: She is fixing a city model.
  de TS: Sie repariert das Modell einer Stadt.
  EN FS: She is fixing a car model.
  de FS: Sie repariert das Modell eines Autos.
  EN TP: a model of a city
  de TP: ein Modell einer Stadt
  EN FP: a model on a catwalk
  de FP: ein Model auf dem Laufsteg
4322 | dance (noun): an artistic form of moving to music | loc: der Tanz
  EN TS: What a beautiful dance!
  de TS: Was für ein schöner Tanz!
  EN FS: What a beautiful car!
  de FS: Was für ein schönes Auto!
  EN TP: a tango dance
  de TP: ein Tango-Tanz
  EN FP: a dance class
  de FP: ein Tanzkurs
4323 | lane (noun): a narrow way or road | loc: Gasse
  EN TS: Nice dance moves in the lane!
  de TS: Coole Tanzmoves in der Gasse!
  EN FS: Nice bike tricks in the lane!
  de FS: Coole Biketricks in der Gasse!
  EN TP: a narrow painted lane
  de TP: eine schmale bemalte Gasse
  EN FP: a fast lane
  de FP: eine Überholspur
4324 | vast (adjective): unusually great in size or extent | loc: riesig
  EN TS: Vast glacier, tiny human.
  de TS: Riesiger Gletscher, winziger Mensch.
  EN FS: Vast glacier, tiny penguin.
  de FS: Riesiger Gletscher, winziger Pinguin.
  EN TP: a vast wall of ice
  de TP: eine riesige Wand aus Eis
  EN FP: a vast crowd of people
  de FP: eine riesige Menschenmenge
4325 | cattle (noun): cows and bulls as a group of farm animals | loc: Rinder
  EN TS: Fact: the cattle are grazing.
  de TS: Fakt: Die Rinder grasen.
  EN FS: Fact: the horses are grazing.
  de FS: Fakt: Die Pferde grasen.
  EN TP: cattle grazing on a plain
  de TP: grasende Rinder in der Ebene
  EN FP: cattle in a barn
  de FP: Rinder im Stall
4326 | wood (noun): the hard substance under the bark of trees | loc: Holz
  EN TS: The wood is burning.
  de TS: Das Holz brennt.
  EN FS: The coal is burning.
  de FS: Die Kohle brennt.
  EN TP: burning wood
  de TP: brennendes Holz
  EN FP: cutting wood
  de FP: Holz hacken
4327 | barbecue (noun): cooking meat outdoors on a hot grill | loc: Barbecue
  EN TS: Everyone loves his barbecue!
  de TS: Alle lieben sein Barbecue!
  EN FS: Everyone loves his salad!
  de FS: Alle lieben seinen Salat!
  EN TP: a sunset barbecue with friends
  de TP: ein Sunset-Barbecue mit Freunden
  EN FP: a barbecue in the rain
  de FP: ein Barbecue im Regen
4328 | rug (noun): a thick heavy fabric floor covering | loc: Teppich
  EN TS: The rug has a fringe.
  de TS: Der Teppich hat Fransen.
  EN FS: The rug has a hole.
  de FS: Der Teppich hat ein Loch.
  EN TP: a fringed rug
  de TP: ein Teppich mit Fransen
  EN FP: a rug on the wall
  de FP: ein Teppich an der Wand
4329 | furniture (noun): the furnishings that make a room ready to use | loc: Möbel
  EN TS: They are sitting on furniture.
  de TS: Sie sitzen auf Möbeln.
  EN FS: They are sitting on the floor.
  de FS: Sie sitzen auf dem Boden.
  EN TP: sitting on soft furniture
  de TP: auf weichen Möbeln sitzen
  EN FP: carrying the furniture
  de FP: die Möbel tragen
4330 | march (verb): to march in a procession | loc: marschieren
  EN TS: The soldiers are marching.
  de TS: Die Soldaten marschieren.
  EN FS: The soldiers are dancing.
  de FS: Die Soldaten tanzen.
  EN TP: soldiers marching in step
  de TP: im Gleichschritt marschierende Soldaten
  EN FP: soldiers marching at night
  de FP: nachts marschierende Soldaten
4331 | march (noun): walking with regular steps in a procession | loc: Marsch
  EN TS: It is a very precise march.
  de TS: Das ist ein sehr präziser Marsch.
  EN FS: It is a very messy march.
  de FS: Das ist ein sehr chaotischer Marsch.
  EN TP: a march down the street
  de TP: ein Marsch die Straße entlang
  EN FP: a march in the forest
  de FP: ein Marsch im Wald
4332 | arrest (verb): to take someone into custody | loc: verhaften
  EN TS: He is arresting a burglar with rubber chickens.
  de TS: Er verhaftet einen Einbrecher mit Gummihühnern.
  EN FS: He is arresting a burglar with gold watches.
  de FS: Er verhaftet einen Einbrecher mit Golduhren.
  EN TP: arresting a burglar
  de TP: einen Einbrecher verhaften
  EN FP: arresting a police officer
  de FP: einen Polizisten verhaften
4333 | platform (noun): a raised flat surface | loc: Plattform
  EN TS: She stepped onto the platform.
  de TS: Sie ist auf die Plattform gestiegen.
  EN FS: She stepped onto the bus.
  de FS: Sie ist in den Bus gestiegen.
  EN TP: a busy station platform
  de TP: eine belebte Plattform am Bahnhof
  EN FP: a diving platform
  de FP: eine Sprungplattform
4334 | studio (noun): a workplace for practising or teaching an art | loc: Atelier
  EN TS: She is painting in her studio.
  de TS: Sie malt in ihrem Atelier.
  EN FS: She is dancing in her studio.
  de FS: Sie tanzt in ihrem Atelier.
  EN TP: a painter's busy studio
  de TP: das volle Atelier einer Malerin
  EN FP: a recording studio
  de FP: ein Tonstudio
4335 | ask (verb): to inquire about something | loc: fragen
  EN TS: The whole hall wants to ask!
  de TS: Der ganze Saal will was fragen!
  EN FS: The whole hall wants to leave!
  de FS: Der ganze Saal will gehen!
  EN TP: asking a question
  de TP: den Redner etwas fragen
  EN FP: asking for money
  de FP: nach Geld fragen
4336 | instructions (noun): a manual explaining how to use a device | loc: Anleitung
  EN TS: He's reading the instructions, she's building.
  de TS: Er liest die Anleitung, sie baut.
  EN FS: He's reading the newspaper, she's building.
  de FS: Er liest die Zeitung, sie baut.
  EN TP: reading the instructions
  de TP: die Anleitung lesen
  EN FP: ignoring the instructions
  de FP: die Anleitung ignorieren
4337 | phone (verb): to get in touch with someone by telephone | loc: anrufen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is phoning and running!
  de TS: Sie ruft an und rennt dabei!
  EN FS: She is phoning and dancing!
  de FS: Sie ruft an und tanzt dabei!
  EN TP: phoning while running
  de TP: beim Laufen anrufen
  EN FP: phoning while driving
  de FP: beim Autofahren anrufen
4338 | cash (noun): money in the form of bills or coins | loc: das Bargeld
  EN TS: The ATM is spitting out cash.
  de TS: Der Automat spuckt Bargeld aus.
  EN FS: The ATM is spitting out cards.
  de FS: Der Automat spuckt Karten aus.
  EN TP: cash flying out
  de TP: herausfliegendes Bargeld
  EN FP: cash in a wallet
  de FP: Bargeld im Portemonnaie
4339 | bank (noun): a financial institution that keeps and lends money | loc: die Bank
  EN TS: Her bank card works!
  de TS: Ihre Bankkarte funktioniert! Danke, Bank!
  EN FS: Her bank card is broken!
  de FS: Ihre Bankkarte ist kaputt! Danke, Bank!
  EN TP: a row of bank machines
  de TP: eine Reihe Bankautomaten
  EN FP: a bank by the river
  de FP: eine Bank am Fluss
4340 | chips (noun): strips of potato fried in deep fat | loc: Pommes
  EN TS: The gulls want his chips!
  de TS: Die Möwen wollen seine Pommes!
  EN FS: The dogs want his chips!
  de FS: Die Hunde wollen seine Pommes!
  EN TP: shielding his chips from gulls
  de TP: seine Pommes vor Möwen schützen
  EN FP: sharing chips with friends
  de FP: Pommes mit Freunden teilen
4341 | flee (verb): to run away quickly | loc: fliehen
  EN TS: He is fleeing from the gulls!
  de TS: Er flieht vor den Möwen!
  EN FS: He is fleeing from the dogs!
  de FS: Er flieht vor den Hunden!
  EN TP: fleeing from the gulls
  de TP: vor den Möwen fliehen
  EN FP: fleeing from a storm
  de FP: vor einem Sturm fliehen
4342 | haul (verb): to pull something slowly and heavily | loc: schleppen
  EN TS: She is hauling a heavy trunk.
  de TS: Sie schleppt eine schwere Truhe.
  EN FS: She is hauling a heavy chair.
  de FS: Sie schleppt einen schweren Stuhl.
  EN TP: hauling a heavy trunk
  de TP: eine schwere Truhe schleppen
  EN FP: hauling a fishing net
  de FP: ein Fischernetz schleppen
4343 | laughter (noun): the sound of laughing | loc: Lachen
  EN TS: Laughter everywhere!
  de TS: Überall Lachen!
  EN FS: Tears everywhere!
  de FS: Überall Tränen!
  EN TP: laughter in a playroom
  de TP: Lachen im Spielzimmer
  EN FP: laughter in a cinema
  de FP: Lachen im Kino
4344 | affection (noun): a warm feeling of liking someone | loc: Zuneigung
  EN TS: Flour, pastries and affection.
  de TS: Mehl, Gebäck und Zuneigung.
  EN FS: Flour, pizza and affection.
  de FS: Mehl, Pizza und Zuneigung.
  EN TP: affection in the kitchen
  de TP: Zuneigung in der Küche
  EN FP: affection for a pet
  de FP: Zuneigung zu einem Haustier
4345 | joy (noun): the emotion of great happiness | loc: Freude
  EN TS: Gifts, cake, pure joy!
  de TS: Geschenke, Kuchen, pure Freude!
  EN FS: Gifts, pizza, pure joy!
  de FS: Geschenke, Pizza, pure Freude!
  EN TP: joy at a birthday party
  de TP: Freude auf einer Geburtstagsparty
  EN FP: joy at a wedding party
  de FP: Freude auf einer Hochzeitsfeier
4346 | hop (verb): to jump lightly | loc: hüpfen
  EN TS: Yo, kangaroos are hopping by.
  de TS: Yo, Kängurus hüpfen vorbei.
  EN FS: Yo, rabbits are hopping by.
  de FS: Yo, Kaninchen hüpfen vorbei.
  EN TP: kangaroos hopping past
  de TP: vorbeihüpfende Kängurus
  EN FP: hopping on one foot
  de FP: auf einem Bein hüpfen
4347 | ferry (verb): to transport people from one place to another | loc: befördern
  EN TS: A boat is ferrying her across.
  de TS: Ein Boot befördert sie ans andere Ufer.
  EN FS: A bus is ferrying her across.
  de FS: Ein Bus befördert sie ans andere Ufer.
  EN TP: to ferry people across
  de TP: Menschen übers Wasser befördern
  EN FP: to ferry goods upriver
  de FP: Waren flussaufwärts befördern
4348 | athletic (adjective): relating to athletes or sport | loc: athletisch
  EN TS: She looks so athletic!
  de TS: Sie sieht so athletisch aus!
  EN FS: He looks so athletic!
  de FS: Er sieht so athletisch aus!
  EN TP: an athletic surfer
  de TP: eine athletische Surferin
  EN FP: an athletic club meeting
  de FP: ein Treffen des Athletikclubs
4349 | guard (noun): a person who keeps watch over something | loc: Wächter
  EN TS: This guard can really surf.
  de TS: Dieser Wächter kann echt surfen.
  EN FS: This guard can really ski.
  de FS: Dieser Wächter kann echt Ski fahren.
  EN TP: a guard on a surfboard
  de TP: ein Wächter auf einem Surfbrett
  EN FP: a guard on a horse
  de FP: ein Wächter auf einem Pferd
4350 | bell (noun): a hollow metal device that rings when struck | loc: die Glocke
  EN TS: Each cow has a big bell.
  de TS: Jede Kuh hat eine große Glocke.
  EN FS: Each cow has a big horn.
  de FS: Jede Kuh hat ein großes Horn.
  EN TP: a bell on a cow
  de TP: eine Glocke an einer Kuh
  EN FP: a bell on a church
  de FP: eine Glocke an einer Kirche
4351 | marble (noun): a hard rock that takes a high polish | loc: Marmor
  EN TS: She is leaning on the marble.
  de TS: Sie lehnt am Marmor.
  EN FS: She is leaning on the piano.
  de FS: Sie lehnt am Klavier.
  EN TP: a polished marble railing
  de TP: ein poliertes Marmorgeländer
  EN FP: a marble garden statue
  de FP: eine Gartenstatue aus Marmor
4352 | turn (noun): the act of changing direction | loc: Kurve
  EN TS: She is making a sharp turn.
  de TS: Sie macht eine scharfe Kurve.
  EN FS: She is making a sharp jump.
  de FS: Sie macht einen hohen Sprung.
  EN TP: a sharp turn on skis
  de TP: eine scharfe Kurve auf Skiern
  EN FP: a wrong turn on skis
  de FP: eine falsche Abzweigung auf Skiern
4353 | dessert (noun): a sweet dish served at the end of a meal | loc: das Dessert
  EN TS: Great dessert, chef.
  de TS: Tolles Dessert, Chef.
  EN FS: Great salad, chef.
  de FS: Toller Salat, Chef.
  EN TP: a chocolate cake dessert
  de TP: ein Schokokuchen als Dessert
  EN FP: a dessert of fresh fruit
  de FP: ein Dessert aus frischem Obst
4354 | kick (noun): a blow with the foot | loc: Tritt
  EN TS: Her kick sent leaves flying.
  de TS: Ihr Tritt lässt Blätter fliegen.
  EN FS: Her kick sent acorns flying.
  de FS: Ihr Tritt lässt Eicheln fliegen.
  EN TP: a kick in the leaves
  de TP: ein Tritt ins Laub
  EN FP: a kick at a football
  de FP: ein Tritt gegen einen Fußball
4355 | adorable (adjective): lovable in a sweet, childlike way | loc: bezaubernd
  EN TS: An adorable baby is kicking its feet.
  de TS: Ein bezauberndes Baby strampelt mit den Füßen.
  EN FS: An adorable puppy is kicking its feet.
  de FS: Ein bezaubernder Welpe strampelt mit den Füßen.
  EN TP: an adorable smiling baby
  de TP: ein bezauberndes lächelndes Baby
  EN FP: an adorable sleeping kitten
  de FP: ein bezauberndes schlafendes Kätzchen
4356 | sore (adjective): painful, hurting | loc: schmerzend
  EN TS: Sore back? Still a piggyback!
  de TS: Schmerzender Rücken? Trotzdem Huckepack!
  EN FS: Sore neck? Still a piggyback!
  de FS: Schmerzender Nacken? Trotzdem Huckepack!
  EN TP: rubbing a sore back
  de TP: einen schmerzenden Rücken reiben
  EN FP: a sore throat in bed
  de FP: ein schmerzender Hals im Bett
4357 | canvas (noun): a heavy woven fabric used for sails or tents | loc: Segeltuch
  EN TS: Her canvas rucksack could hold a sofa.
  de TS: In ihren Rucksack aus Segeltuch würde ein Sofa passen.
  EN FS: Her leather rucksack could hold a sofa.
  de FS: In ihren Rucksack aus Leder würde ein Sofa passen.
  EN TP: a big canvas rucksack
  de TP: ein großer Rucksack aus Segeltuch
  EN FP: a canvas for painting
  de FP: eine Leinwand zum Malen
4358 | heavy (adjective): of great physical weight | loc: schwer
  EN TS: That bag looks a bit heavy.
  de TS: Die Tasche sieht ein bisschen schwer aus.
  EN FS: That bike looks a bit heavy.
  de FS: Das Fahrrad sieht ein bisschen schwer aus.
  EN TP: a heavy rucksack
  de TP: ein schwerer Rucksack
  EN FP: heavy rain
  de FP: ein schweres Gewitter
4359 | can (noun): a sealed metal container for food or drink | loc: Dose
  EN TS: The cans are falling out.
  de TS: Die Dosen fallen raus.
  EN FS: The eggs are falling out.
  de FS: Die Eier fallen raus.
  EN TP: cans falling from a bag
  de TP: aus der Tüte fallende Dosen
  EN FP: a can of paint
  de FP: eine Dose Farbe
4360 | purse (noun): a container for carrying money and small items | loc: Handtasche
  EN TS: She bought more than a purse.
  de TS: Sie hat mehr als eine Handtasche gekauft.
  EN FS: She sold more than a purse.
  de FS: Sie hat mehr als eine Handtasche verkauft.
  EN TP: showing off a new purse
  de TP: eine neue Handtasche vorführen
  EN FP: losing her purse
  de FP: ihre Handtasche verlieren
4361 | shop (verb): to do your shopping | loc: einkaufen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is shopping like a pro.
  de TS: Sie kauft ein wie ein Profi.
  EN FS: He is shopping like a pro.
  de FS: Er kauft ein wie ein Profi.
  EN TP: shopping with many bags
  de TP: mit vielen Tüten einkaufen
  EN FP: shopping for food
  de FP: Lebensmittel einkaufen
4362 | belt (noun): a loop of flexible material running between wheels | loc: Förderband
  EN TS: A suitcase is on the belt.
  de TS: Ein Koffer liegt auf dem Förderband.
  EN FS: A suitcase is on the bus.
  de FS: Ein Koffer liegt im Bus.
  EN TP: a moving luggage belt
  de TP: ein laufendes Förderband fürs Gepäck
  EN FP: a leather belt
  de FP: ein Ledergürtel
4363 | appear (verb): to come into sight | loc: erscheinen
  EN TS: His backpack finally appeared!
  de TS: Sein Rucksack ist endlich erschienen!
  EN FS: His suitcase finally appeared!
  de FS: Sein Koffer ist endlich erschienen!
  EN TP: appearing on the belt
  de TP: auf dem Band erscheinen
  EN FP: appearing on television
  de FP: im Fernsehen erscheinen
4364 | dough (noun): a flour mixture you can knead or roll | loc: Teig
  EN TS: Dough in, croissants out!
  de TS: Teig rein, Croissants raus!
  EN FS: Dough in, pizzas out!
  de FS: Teig rein, Pizzen raus!
  EN TP: balls of raw dough
  de TP: Kugeln aus rohem Teig
  EN FP: dough for a pizza base
  de FP: Teig für einen Pizzaboden
4365 | fresh (adjective): recently made, produced or picked | loc: frisch
  EN TS: So much fresh bread!
  de TS: So viel frisches Brot!
  EN FS: So much fresh fish!
  de FS: So viel frischer Fisch!
  EN TP: fresh bread from the oven
  de TP: frisches Brot aus dem Ofen
  EN FP: fresh fish from the sea
  de FP: frischer Fisch aus dem Meer
4366 | job (noun): the main activity you do to earn money | loc: Arbeit
  EN TS: He loves his job.
  de TS: Er liebt seine Arbeit.
  EN FS: He hates his job.
  de FS: Er hasst seine Arbeit.
  EN TP: a job in a bakery
  de TP: Arbeit in einer Bäckerei
  EN FP: a job in a bank
  de FP: Arbeit in einer Bank
4367 | dry (verb): to remove the moisture and make dry | loc: trocknen
  EN TS: Sheets are drying in the wind.
  de TS: Laken trocknen im Wind.
  EN FS: Sheets are drying on a boat.
  de FS: Laken trocknen auf einem Boot.
  EN TP: sheets drying in the wind
  de TP: im Wind trocknende Laken
  EN FP: dishes drying on a rack
  de FP: auf dem Gestell trocknendes Geschirr
4368 | light (verb): to make something lighter or brighter | loc: beleuchten
  EN TS: She is lighting the bulbs.
  de TS: Sie beleuchtet alles mit Glühbirnen.
  EN FS: She is lighting the candles.
  de FS: Sie beleuchtet alles mit Kerzen.
  EN TP: lighting a string of bulbs
  de TP: mit einer Lichterkette beleuchten
  EN FP: lighting a candle
  de FP: eine Kerze anzünden
4369 | tape (noun): a long thin strip of cloth or paper for fastening | loc: Band | translator note: Band alone is not idiomatic for adhesive tape; used Klebeband
  EN TS: Too much tape? Maybe a little.
  de TS: Zu viel Klebeband? Vielleicht ein bisschen.
  EN FS: Too much glue? Maybe a little.
  de FS: Zu viel Kleber? Vielleicht ein bisschen.
  EN TP: wrapped in white tape
  de TP: in weißes Klebeband gewickelt
  EN FP: tape on a cardboard box
  de FP: Klebeband auf einem Karton
4370 | safe (noun): a strongbox where valuables are kept | loc: Tresor
  EN TS: The big safe is open.
  de TS: Der große Tresor ist offen.
  EN FS: The big safe is closed.
  de FS: Der große Tresor ist zu.
  EN TP: an open bank safe
  de TP: ein offener Banktresor
  EN FP: a safe place to hide
  de FP: ein sicheres Versteck
4371 | lobby (noun): a large entrance or reception area | loc: Eingangshalle
  EN TS: The bank lobby is huge.
  de TS: Die Eingangshalle der Bank ist riesig.
  EN FS: The bank lobby is tiny.
  de FS: Die Eingangshalle der Bank ist winzig.
  EN TP: a marble bank lobby
  de TP: eine Eingangshalle aus Marmor
  EN FP: a busy hotel lobby
  de FP: eine volle Hotellobby
4373 | gather (verb): to get together, assemble | loc: sich versammeln
  EN TS: The squad gathered on a roof.
  de TS: Die Crew hat sich auf einem Dach versammelt.
  EN FS: The squad gathered on a boat.
  de FS: Die Crew hat sich auf einem Boot versammelt.
  EN TP: friends gathering on a roof
  de TP: auf dem Dach versammelte Freunde
  EN FP: gathering wood for a fire
  de FP: Holz fürs Feuer sammeln
4374 | electric (adjective): using or producing electricity | loc: elektrisch
  EN TS: The barber uses electric clippers.
  de TS: Der Barbier benutzt einen elektrischen Haarschneider.
  EN FS: The barber uses an electric fan.
  de FS: Der Barbier benutzt einen elektrischen Ventilator.
  EN TP: an electric hair clipper
  de TP: ein elektrischer Haarschneider
  EN FP: an electric guitar
  de FP: eine elektrische Gitarre
4375 | rough (adjective): having an irregular, uneven surface | loc: rau
  EN TS: The bark is rough and cracked.
  de TS: Die Rinde ist rau und rissig.
  EN FS: The bark is smooth and clean.
  de FS: Die Rinde ist glatt und sauber.
  EN TP: rough tree bark
  de TP: raue Baumrinde
  EN FP: rough sea waves
  de FP: raue See
4376 | noise (noun): sound of any kind, often unpleasant | loc: Lärm
  EN TS: The smallest dog is making the biggest noise!
  de TS: Der kleinste Hund macht den größten Lärm!
  EN FS: The smallest cat is making the biggest noise!
  de FS: Die kleinste Katze macht den größten Lärm!
  EN TP: a lot of noise
  de TP: ganz viel Lärm
  EN FP: a lot of music
  de FP: ganz viel Musik
4377 | basement (noun): a room below ground level in a building | loc: Keller
  EN TS: The basement has a cinema!
  de TS: Der Keller hat ein Kino!
  EN FS: The basement has a pool!
  de FS: Der Keller hat einen Pool!
  EN TP: a basement home cinema
  de TP: ein Heimkino im Keller
  EN FP: a basement full of water
  de FP: ein Keller voller Wasser
4378 | shower (noun): a fixture that sprays water over you | loc: Dusche
  EN TS: Two showers in one bathroom? Wow!
  de TS: Zwei Duschen in einem Bad? Wow!
  EN FS: Two toilets in one bathroom? Wow!
  de FS: Zwei Toiletten in einem Bad? Wow!
  EN TP: a shower on the wall
  de TP: eine Dusche an der Wand
  EN FP: a shower in the garden
  de FP: eine Dusche im Garten
4379 | tub (noun): a large open container you fill with water to wash | loc: Wanne
  EN TS: The tub is foaming over!
  de TS: Die Wanne schäumt über!
  EN FS: The sink is foaming over!
  de FS: Das Waschbecken schäumt über!
  EN TP: scrubbing the tub
  de TP: die Wanne schrubben
  EN FP: a tub of ice cream
  de FP: eine Packung Eiscreme
4380 | fill (verb): to make something full | loc: füllen
  EN TS: She is filling the bath.
  de TS: Sie füllt die Badewanne.
  EN FS: She is filling the sink.
  de FS: Sie füllt das Waschbecken.
  EN TP: filling a bath with foam
  de TP: eine Wanne mit Schaum füllen
  EN FP: filling a glass with water
  de FP: ein Glas mit Wasser füllen
4381 | warm (adjective): having a comfortable degree of heat | loc: warm
  EN TS: A warm day at the beach.
  de TS: Ein warmer Tag am Strand.
  EN FS: A cold day at the beach.
  de FS: Ein kalter Tag am Strand.
  EN TP: a warm sunny beach
  de TP: ein warmer, sonniger Strand
  EN FP: a warm winter coat
  de FP: ein warmer Wintermantel
4382 | salmon (noun): a large food fish of northern waters | loc: Lachs
  EN TS: The bear is grabbing a salmon.
  de TS: Der Bär schnappt sich einen Lachs.
  EN FS: The bear is grabbing a bird.
  de FS: Der Bär schnappt sich einen Vogel.
  EN TP: a leaping salmon
  de TP: ein springender Lachs
  EN FP: a salmon on a plate
  de FP: ein Lachs auf dem Teller
4383 | thick (adjective): not thin, wide from one surface to the other | loc: dick
  EN TS: What a thick beard!
  de TS: Was für ein dicker Bart!
  EN FS: What a thin beard!
  de FS: Was für ein dünner Bart!
  EN TP: a thick black beard
  de TP: ein dicker schwarzer Bart
  EN FP: a thick winter coat
  de FP: ein dicker Wintermantel
4384 | bounce (verb): to spring back after hitting something | loc: abprallen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She bounced off her bed!
  de TS: Sie ist vom Bett abgeprallt!
  EN FS: She bounced off the sofa!
  de FS: Sie ist vom Sofa abgeprallt!
  EN TP: bouncing on the bed
  de TP: vom Bett abprallen
  EN FP: bouncing a ball
  de FP: einen Ball abprallen lassen
4385 | cost (verb): to be priced at a certain amount | loc: kosten
  EN TS: The big bed costs 20,000 euros. "Cheap."
  de TS: Das große Bett kostet 20.000 Euro. „Billig.“
  EN FS: The big bed costs 200 euros. "Cheap."
  de FS: Das große Bett kostet 200 Euro. „Billig.“
  EN TP: costing 20,000 euros
  de TP: 20.000 Euro kosten
  EN FP: costing 50 cents
  de FP: 50 Cent kosten
4386 | poster (noun): a sign put up in a public place as an advert | loc: Poster
  EN TS: Posters cover his whole room.
  de TS: Poster bedecken sein ganzes Zimmer.
  EN FS: Maps cover his whole room.
  de FS: Landkarten bedecken sein ganzes Zimmer.
  EN TP: walls covered in posters
  de TP: Wände voller Poster
  EN FP: posters on the fridge
  de FP: Poster am Kühlschrank
4387 | compare (verb): to examine how things are similar or different | loc: vergleichen
  EN TS: We compare three bedrooms.
  de TS: Wir vergleichen drei Schlafzimmer.
  EN FS: We compare three kitchens.
  de FS: Wir vergleichen drei Küchen.
  EN TP: comparing three bedrooms
  de TP: drei Schlafzimmer vergleichen
  EN FP: comparing three kitchens
  de FP: drei Küchen vergleichen
4388 | daisy (noun): a plant with flower heads of white ray petals | loc: Gänseblümchen
  EN TS: A bee is pollinating daisies.
  de TS: Eine Biene bestäubt Gänseblümchen.
  EN FS: A bird is pollinating daisies.
  de FS: Ein Vogel bestäubt Gänseblümchen.
  EN TP: a bee over the daisies
  de TP: eine Biene über Gänseblümchen
  EN FP: a daisy chain necklace
  de FP: eine Gänseblümchenkette
4389 | start (verb): to take the first step in doing something | loc: anfangen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He missed the start. Oops.
  de TS: Es hat ohne ihn angefangen. Ups.
  EN FS: He missed the bus. Oops.
  de FS: Der Bus ist ohne ihn abgefahren. Ups.
  EN TP: missing the start
  de TP: den Anfang verpassen
  EN FP: starting a car
  de FP: ein Auto starten
4390 | excitement (noun): the feeling of lively, cheerful joy | loc: Aufregung
  EN TS: The excitement is real!
  de TS: Die Aufregung ist echt!
  EN FS: The boredom is real!
  de FS: Die Langeweile ist echt!
  EN TP: excitement before a concert
  de TP: Aufregung vor einem Konzert
  EN FP: excitement before an exam
  de FP: Aufregung vor einer Prüfung
4391 | alone (adverb): without any others with you | loc: allein
  EN TS: Alone with a whole pizza? Yes!
  de TS: Allein mit einer ganzen Pizza? Ja!
  EN FS: Alone with a whole cake? Yes!
  de FS: Allein mit einem ganzen Kuchen? Ja!
  EN TP: home alone with pizza
  de TP: allein zu Haus mit Pizza
  EN FP: alone in a restaurant
  de FP: allein im Restaurant
4392 | fall (noun): a sudden drop from standing up | loc: Sturz
  EN TS: What a fall in the park!
  de TS: Was für ein Sturz im Park!
  EN FS: What a fall in the kitchen!
  de FS: Was für ein Sturz in der Küche!
  EN TP: a fall over a bench
  de TP: ein Sturz über eine Bank
  EN FP: a fall from a ladder
  de FP: ein Sturz von der Leiter
4393 | chat (verb): to talk in a friendly, relaxed way | loc: plaudern
  EN TS: The old guys are chatting.
  de TS: Die alten Jungs plaudern.
  EN FS: The old guys are fighting.
  de FS: Die alten Jungs prügeln sich.
  EN TP: chatting on a bench
  de TP: auf einer Bank plaudern
  EN FP: chatting on the phone
  de FP: am Telefon plaudern
4394 | bend (verb): to form a curve | loc: biegen
  EN TS: She is bending everything!
  de TS: Sie biegt alles!
  EN FS: She is breaking everything!
  de FS: Sie zerbricht alles!
  EN TP: bending a tree branch
  de TP: einen Ast biegen
  EN FP: bending a spoon
  de FP: einen Löffel biegen
4395 | opponent (noun): a contestant you are matched against | loc: Gegner
  EN TS: She is attacking her opponent.
  de TS: Sie greift ihren Gegner an.
  EN FS: She is hugging her opponent.
  de FS: Sie umarmt ihren Gegner.
  EN TP: a sneaky opponent
  de TP: ein hinterhältiger Gegner
  EN FP: an opponent in the ring
  de FP: ein Gegner im Ring
4396 | shock (verb): to surprise someone greatly | loc: schockieren
  EN TS: Her move totally shocked him!
  de TS: Ihr Move hat ihn total schockiert!
  EN FS: Her move totally bored him!
  de FS: Ihr Move hat ihn total gelangweilt!
  EN TP: shocked by her move
  de TP: von ihrem Move schockiert
  EN FP: shocked by the price
  de FP: vom Preis schockiert
4397 | bike (verb): to ride a bicycle | loc: Rad fahren
  EN TS: He is biking in Amsterdam.
  de TS: Er fährt in Amsterdam Rad.
  EN FS: He is biking in the forest.
  de FS: Er fährt im Wald Rad.
  EN TP: to bike along a canal
  de TP: an einer Gracht entlang Rad fahren
  EN FP: to bike along a beach
  de FP: am Strand entlang Rad fahren
4398 | advertisement (noun): a public promotion of a product or service | loc: Werbung
  EN TS: Advertisements are everywhere!
  de TS: Überall Werbung!
  EN FS: Trees are everywhere!
  de FS: Überall Bäume!
  EN TP: huge lit advertisements
  de TP: riesige leuchtende Werbung
  EN FP: advertisements in a paper
  de FP: Werbung in der Zeitung
4399 | dream (verb): to have a daydream or fantasy | loc: träumen
  EN TS: She is dreaming of a burger.
  de TS: Sie träumt von einem Burger.
  EN FS: She is dreaming of a pizza.
  de FS: Sie träumt von einer Pizza.
  EN TP: dreaming of a big house
  de TP: von einem großen Haus träumen
  EN FP: dreaming at night in bed
  de FP: nachts im Bett träumen
4400 | spot (verb): to catch sight of something | loc: erspähen
  EN TS: She spotted birds at sea.
  de TS: Sie hat Vögel auf dem Meer erspäht.
  EN FS: She spotted ships at sea.
  de FS: Sie hat Schiffe auf dem Meer erspäht.
  EN TP: to spot birds far away
  de TP: Vögel in der Ferne erspähen
  EN FP: to spot a mistake
  de FP: einen Fehler entdecken
4401 | far (adjective): at a great distance | loc: fern
  EN TS: She is looking at the far shore.
  de TS: Sie schaut auf das ferne Ufer.
  EN FS: She is looking at the far city.
  de FS: Sie schaut auf die ferne Stadt.
  EN TP: the far lake shore
  de TP: das ferne Seeufer
  EN FP: a far country
  de FP: ein fernes Land
4402 | appetite (noun): a feeling of craving food or something else | loc: Appetit
  EN TS: Apple, burger, melon: big appetite!
  de TS: Apfel, Burger, Melone: krasser Appetit!
  EN FS: Apple, pizza, melon: big appetite!
  de FS: Apfel, Pizza, Melone: krasser Appetit!
  EN TP: a huge picnic appetite
  de TP: riesiger Appetit beim Picknick
  EN FP: no appetite at all
  de FP: überhaupt kein Appetit
4403 | layer (noun): a single thickness of some material | loc: Schicht
  EN TS: Just one more layer.
  de TS: Nur noch eine Schicht.
  EN FS: Just one more pillow.
  de FS: Nur noch ein Kissen.
  EN TP: layer after layer of blankets
  de TP: Schicht um Schicht Decken
  EN FP: a layer of fresh snow
  de FP: eine Schicht Neuschnee
4404 | injury (noun): physical damage to the body from an accident | loc: Verletzung
  EN TS: He has a finger injury.
  de TS: Er hat eine Verletzung am Finger.
  EN FS: He has a knee injury.
  de FS: Er hat eine Verletzung am Knie.
  EN TP: a finger injury
  de TP: eine Verletzung am Finger
  EN FP: a sports injury
  de FP: eine Sportverletzung
4405 | help (noun): the activity of doing something for someone's need | loc: Hilfe
  EN TS: His friend is a big help.
  de TS: Sein Freund ist eine große Hilfe.
  EN FS: His dog is a big help.
  de FS: Sein Hund ist eine große Hilfe.
  EN TP: help from a friend
  de TP: Hilfe von einem Freund
  EN FP: help with homework
  de FP: Hilfe bei den Hausaufgaben
4406 | smooth (verb): to make something smooth, as if by rubbing | loc: glätten
  EN TS: The artist is smoothing lines.
  de TS: Der Künstler glättet Linien.
  EN FS: The artist is drawing lines.
  de FS: Der Künstler zeichnet Linien.
  EN TP: smoothing harsh lines
  de TP: harte Linien glätten
  EN FP: smoothing a bed sheet
  de FP: ein Bettlaken glätten
4407 | healthy (adjective): having good health in body or mind | loc: gesund
  EN TS: Spinach keeps him healthy.
  de TS: Spinat hält ihn gesund.
  EN FS: Chocolate keeps him healthy.
  de FS: Schokolade hält ihn gesund.
  EN TP: a healthy young man
  de TP: ein gesunder junger Mann
  EN FP: a healthy bank account
  de FP: ein gesundes Bankkonto
4408 | taste (noun): the sensation you get from food on your tongue | loc: Geschmack
  EN TS: Smoothie taste: perfect!
  de TS: Der Smoothie? Geschmack: perfekt!
  EN FS: Coffee taste: perfect!
  de FS: Der Kaffee? Geschmack: perfekt!
  EN TP: the taste of a smoothie
  de TP: der Geschmack eines Smoothies
  EN FP: a good taste in music
  de FP: guter Geschmack bei Musik
4409 | blind (adjective): unable to see | loc: blind
  EN TS: The whole party is blind!
  de TS: Die ganze Party ist blind!
  EN FS: The whole party is asleep!
  de FS: Die ganze Party schläft!
  EN TP: blind for a party game
  de TP: blind für ein Partyspiel
  EN FP: a blind date
  de FP: ein Blind Date
4410 | contest (noun): an event where a winner is chosen from contestants | loc: Wettbewerb
  EN TS: Staring contest! Don't blink!
  de TS: Wettbewerb im Anstarren! Nicht blinzeln!
  EN FS: Eating contest! Don't blink!
  de FS: Wettbewerb im Essen! Nicht blinzeln!
  EN TP: a staring contest
  de TP: ein Wettbewerb im Anstarren
  EN FP: a singing contest
  de FP: ein Gesangswettbewerb
4411 | treatment (noun): medical care given to help someone get better | loc: Behandlung
  EN TS: The treatment is a plaster.
  de TS: Die Behandlung ist ein Pflaster.
  EN FS: The treatment is an injection.
  de FS: Die Behandlung ist eine Spritze.
  EN TP: treatment for a blister
  de TP: Behandlung einer Blase
  EN FP: treatment for a headache
  de FP: Behandlung gegen Kopfschmerzen
4412 | block (verb): to make a way unsuitable for passage | loc: blockieren
  EN TS: Sheep are blocking the road!
  de TS: Schafe blockieren die Straße!
  EN FS: Cows are blocking the road!
  de FS: Kühe blockieren die Straße!
  EN TP: blocking a mountain road
  de TP: eine Bergstraße blockieren
  EN FP: blocking a phone number
  de FP: eine Telefonnummer blockieren
4413 | smell (noun): the sensation you get from odors in the nose | loc: Geruch
  EN TS: She loves the smell.
  de TS: Sie liebt den Geruch.
  EN FS: She hates the smell.
  de FS: Sie hasst den Geruch.
  EN TP: the smell of blossoms
  de TP: der Geruch von Blüten
  EN FP: the smell of coffee
  de FP: der Geruch von Kaffee
4414 | struggle (noun): an energetic attempt to achieve something | loc: Kampf
  EN TS: Going uphill is a real struggle.
  de TS: Bergauf ist es ein echter Kampf.
  EN FS: Going downhill is a real struggle.
  de FS: Bergab ist es ein echter Kampf.
  EN TP: a struggle against the wind
  de TP: ein Kampf gegen den Wind
  EN FP: a struggle with homework
  de FP: ein Kampf mit den Hausaufgaben
4415 | compliment (noun): a remark expressing praise or admiration | loc: Kompliment
  EN TS: Stop it! Too many compliments!
  de TS: Hör auf! Zu viele Komplimente!
  EN FS: Stop it! Too many questions!
  de FS: Hör auf! Zu viele Fragen!
  EN TP: blushing at a compliment
  de TP: rot werden bei einem Kompliment
  EN FP: a compliment to the chef
  de FP: ein Kompliment an den Koch
4416 | ticket (noun): a document that lets you ride or enter somewhere | loc: Ticket
  EN TS: Green light, ticket OK!
  de TS: Grünes Licht, Ticket passt!
  EN FS: Green light, passport OK!
  de FS: Grünes Licht, Reisepass passt!
  EN TP: scanning a ticket
  de TP: ein Ticket scannen
  EN FP: buying a train ticket
  de FP: ein Zugticket kaufen
4417 | travel (noun): the act of going from one place to another | loc: Reisen
  EN TS: Travel by tram, boat, plane.
  de TS: Reisen mit Tram, Boot, Flugzeug.
  EN FS: Travel by bus, boat, plane.
  de FS: Reisen mit Bus, Boot, Flugzeug.
  EN TP: travel by boat
  de TP: Reisen mit dem Boot
  EN FP: travel by car
  de FP: Reisen mit dem Auto
4418 | burst (verb): to come open suddenly from pressure inside | loc: platzen
  EN TS: Steam burst into her face.
  de TS: Der Dampf platzt ihr direkt ins Gesicht.
  EN FS: Water burst into her face.
  de FS: Das Wasser platzt ihr direkt ins Gesicht.
  EN TP: steam bursting from a pot
  de TP: aus dem Topf platzender Dampf
  EN FP: a burst water pipe
  de FP: ein geplatztes Wasserrohr
4419 | row (verb): to move a boat with oars | loc: rudern
  EN TS: She is rowing with her puppy.
  de TS: Sie rudert mit ihrem Welpen.
  EN FS: She is rowing with her kitten.
  de FS: Sie rudert mit ihrem Kätzchen.
  EN TP: rowing on a calm pond
  de TP: auf einem ruhigen Teich rudern
  EN FP: rowing on a wild sea
  de FP: auf wilder See rudern
4420 | illustration (noun): artwork that helps make something clear | loc: Illustration
  EN TS: The illustration shows a bone.
  de TS: Die Illustration zeigt einen Knochen.
  EN FS: The illustration shows a hand.
  de FS: Die Illustration zeigt eine Hand.
  EN TP: an illustration of a bone
  de TP: eine Illustration eines Knochens
  EN FP: an illustration of a hand
  de FP: eine Illustration einer Hand
4421 | bone (noun): the rigid tissue that makes up the skeleton | loc: Knochen
  EN TS: She is holding a small bone.
  de TS: Sie hält einen kleinen Knochen.
  EN FS: She is holding a small stone.
  de FS: Sie hält einen kleinen Stein.
  EN TP: a long thigh bone
  de TP: ein langer Oberschenkelknochen
  EN FP: a dog's bone
  de FP: ein Hundeknochen
4423 | barrier (noun): a structure that blocks free movement | loc: Barriere
  EN TS: The barrier is up. Run!
  de TS: Die Barriere ist oben. Lauf!
  EN FS: The barrier is down. Run!
  de FS: Die Barriere ist unten. Lauf!
  EN TP: a raised barrier
  de TP: eine hochgeklappte Barriere
  EN FP: a language barrier
  de FP: eine Sprachbarriere
4424 | border (noun): the line where one country meets another | loc: Grenze
  EN TS: The border is just a stripe.
  de TS: Die Grenze ist nur ein Streifen.
  EN FS: The border is just a fence.
  de FS: Die Grenze ist nur ein Zaun.
  EN TP: crossing the border on foot
  de TP: die Grenze zu Fuß überqueren
  EN FP: a border around a picture
  de FP: eine Umrandung um ein Bild
4425 | order (verb): to direct somebody to do something with authority | loc: befehlen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The robot is ordering them around.
  de TS: Der Roboter befiehlt ihnen alles.
  EN FS: The robot is ordering a big pizza.
  de FS: Der Roboter bestellt eine große Pizza.
  EN TP: to order the team around
  de TP: dem Team etwas befehlen
  EN FP: to order a coffee
  de FP: einen Kaffee bestellen
4426 | meeting (noun): a formally arranged gathering | loc: Besprechung
  EN TS: The meeting went well.
  de TS: Die Besprechung lief gut.
  EN FS: The meeting went badly.
  de FS: Die Besprechung lief schlecht.
  EN TP: a meeting in the office
  de TP: eine Besprechung im Büro
  EN FP: a meeting in the park
  de FP: eine Besprechung im Park
4427 | ceremony (noun): a formal event on a special occasion | loc: Zeremonie
  EN TS: They are bowing at a ceremony.
  de TS: Sie verbeugen sich bei einer Zeremonie.
  EN FS: They are eating at a ceremony.
  de FS: Sie essen bei einer Zeremonie.
  EN TP: a formal bowing ceremony
  de TP: eine förmliche Zeremonie mit Verbeugung
  EN FP: a wedding ceremony
  de FP: eine Hochzeitszeremonie
4429 | restaurant (noun): a building where people go to eat | loc: Restaurant
  EN TS: Ramen at a noodle restaurant!
  de TS: Ramen in einem Nudelrestaurant!
  EN FS: Ramen at a burger restaurant!
  de FS: Ramen in einem Burgerrestaurant!
  EN TP: a noodle restaurant
  de TP: ein Nudelrestaurant
  EN FP: a restaurant kitchen
  de FP: eine Restaurantküche
4430 | kid (noun): a young person | loc: Kind
  EN TS: The kid is so happy!
  de TS: Das Kind ist so glücklich!
  EN FS: The kid is so sad!
  de FS: Das Kind ist so traurig!
  EN TP: a kid running fast
  de TP: ein schnell rennendes Kind
  EN FP: a kid sitting still
  de FP: ein still sitzendes Kind
4431 | score (verb): to gain points in a game | loc: punkten
  EN TS: He scored, the dog wants a turn.
  de TS: Er hat gepunktet, jetzt will der Hund ran.
  EN FS: He scored, the cat wants a turn.
  de FS: Er hat gepunktet, jetzt will die Katze ran.
  EN TP: scoring a goal
  de TP: mit einem Tor punkten
  EN FP: scoring a basket
  de FP: mit einem Korb punkten
4432 | ignore (verb): to refuse to notice or acknowledge | loc: ignorieren
  EN TS: Everyone is ignoring him.
  de TS: Alle ignorieren ihn.
  EN FS: Everyone is hugging him.
  de FS: Alle umarmen ihn.
  EN TP: ignoring the salesman
  de TP: den Verkäufer ignorieren
  EN FP: ignoring a phone call
  de FP: einen Anruf ignorieren
4433 | bunch (noun): a grouping of similar things | loc: Bündel | checker: word_missing? | translator note: Bündel is wrong for flowers; used Strauß
  EN TS: She will love this bunch.
  de TS: Sie wird diesen Strauß lieben.
  EN FS: She will love this cake.
  de FS: Sie wird diesen Kuchen lieben.
  EN TP: a bunch of roses
  de TP: ein Strauß Rosen
  EN FP: a bunch of keys
  de FP: ein Schlüsselbund
4434 | fair (noun): a traveling show with rides and games | loc: Jahrmarkt
  EN TS: The fair is fun for two.
  de TS: Der Jahrmarkt macht zu zweit Spaß.
  EN FS: The zoo is fun for two.
  de FS: Der Zoo macht zu zweit Spaß.
  EN TP: a date at the fair
  de TP: ein Date auf dem Jahrmarkt
  EN FP: a fair price
  de FP: ein fairer Preis
4435 | exhibition (noun): a collection of things for public display | loc: Ausstellung
  EN TS: Whoa, a brain exhibition!
  de TS: Krass, eine Ausstellung über Gehirne!
  EN FS: Whoa, a car exhibition!
  de FS: Krass, eine Ausstellung über Autos!
  EN TP: a brain exhibition
  de TP: eine Ausstellung über Gehirne
  EN FP: an art exhibition
  de FP: eine Kunstausstellung
4436 | cheer (noun): a shout of approval | loc: Jubel
  EN TS: A kick like Ronaldo gets a big cheer!
  de TS: Ein Schuss wie von Ronaldo – riesiger Jubel!
  EN FS: A header like Ronaldo gets a big cheer!
  de FS: Ein Kopfball wie von Ronaldo – riesiger Jubel!
  EN TP: a cheer for the kick
  de TP: Jubel für den Schuss
  EN FP: a cheer for the singer
  de FP: Jubel für die Sängerin
4438 | parade (noun): a ceremonial procession of people marching | loc: Parade
  EN TS: She is leading the parade!
  de TS: Sie führt die Parade an!
  EN FS: She is leading the marathon!
  de FS: Sie führt den Marathon an!
  EN TP: a carnival parade
  de TP: eine Karnevalsparade
  EN FP: a military parade
  de FP: eine Militärparade
4439 | festival (noun): a day or period set aside for celebration | loc: Fest
  EN TS: The festival is loud!
  de TS: Das Fest ist laut!
  EN FS: The festival is quiet!
  de FS: Das Fest ist leise!
  EN TP: a street festival
  de TP: ein Straßenfest
  EN FP: a film festival
  de FP: ein Filmfestival
4440 | strike (verb): to deliver a sharp blow with the hand or fist | loc: schlagen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is striking concrete!
  de TS: Sie schlägt auf Beton!
  EN FS: She is striking glass!
  de FS: Sie schlägt auf Glas!
  EN TP: striking a stack of slabs
  de TP: auf einen Stapel Platten schlagen
  EN FP: striking a match
  de FP: ein Streichholz anzünden
4441 | breath (noun): the process of taking in and letting out air | loc: Atem
  EN TS: Wow, her breath makes clouds.
  de TS: Wow, ihr Atem macht Wolken.
  EN FS: Wow, her breath makes bubbles.
  de FS: Wow, ihr Atem macht Blasen.
  EN TP: a cloud of warm breath
  de TP: eine Wolke aus warmem Atem
  EN FP: a breath of fresh air
  de FP: ein Hauch frischer Luft
4442 | shoe (noun): footwear shaped to fit the foot | loc: Schuh
  EN TS: Her shoes are white.
  de TS: Ihre Schuhe sind weiß.
  EN FS: Her shoes are red.
  de FS: Ihre Schuhe sind rot.
  EN TP: plain white shoes
  de TP: schlichte weiße Schuhe
  EN FP: white running shoes
  de FP: weiße Laufschuhe
4443 | wedding (noun): the event at which a marriage ceremony happens | loc: Hochzeit
  EN TS: The wedding is starting and everyone is turning around.
  de TS: Die Hochzeit beginnt und alle drehen sich um.
  EN FS: The wedding is ending and everyone is turning around.
  de FS: Die Hochzeit endet und alle drehen sich um.
  EN TP: walking down a wedding aisle
  de TP: Einzug bei der Hochzeit
  EN FP: dancing at a wedding party
  de FP: Tanzen auf der Hochzeitsfeier
4445 | bridge (noun): a structure that lets people cross a river or road | loc: Brücke
  EN TS: Wow, this bridge is huge!
  de TS: Wow, diese Brücke ist riesig!
  EN FS: Wow, this boat is huge!
  de FS: Wow, dieses Boot ist riesig!
  EN TP: a red suspension bridge
  de TP: eine rote Hängebrücke
  EN FP: a bridge over a road
  de FP: eine Brücke über eine Straße
4446 | glass (noun): a hard transparent solid that breaks easily | loc: Glas
  EN TS: The pub has frosted glass.
  de TS: Die Kneipe hat mattiertes Glas.
  EN FS: The pub has broken glass.
  de FS: Die Kneipe hat kaputtes Glas.
  EN TP: panels of frosted glass
  de TP: Scheiben aus Milchglas
  EN FP: a glass of red wine
  de FP: ein Glas Rotwein
4447 | wet (adjective): covered or soaked with water | loc: nass
  EN TS: Just a little wet today.
  de TS: Heute nur ein bisschen nass.
  EN FS: Just a little snowy today.
  de FS: Heute nur ein bisschen verschneit.
  EN TP: a wet bus stop
  de TP: eine nasse Bushaltestelle
  EN FP: a wet dog
  de FP: ein nasser Hund
4448 | handle (noun): the part of an object you hold to use or move it | loc: Griff
  EN TS: She is gripping the handle.
  de TS: Sie packt den Griff.
  EN FS: She is gripping the ladder.
  de FS: Sie packt die Leiter.
  EN TP: a long blue handle
  de TP: ein langer blauer Griff
  EN FP: a door handle
  de FP: ein Türgriff
4450 | patch (noun): a small part that looks different from the rest | loc: Flicken
  EN TS: His dungarees have patches.
  de TS: Seine Latzhose hat Flicken.
  EN FS: His boots have patches.
  de FS: Seine Stiefel haben Flicken.
  EN TP: patches on the dungarees
  de TP: Flicken auf der Latzhose
  EN FP: a patch of grass
  de FP: ein Fleckchen Gras
4451 | teenager (noun): a juvenile, between puberty and maturity | loc: Teenager
  EN TS: Two teenagers are gaming, so intense.
  de TS: Zwei Teenager zocken, voll intensiv.
  EN FS: Two teenagers are dancing, so intense.
  de FS: Zwei Teenager tanzen, voll intensiv.
  EN TP: teenagers playing a game
  de TP: Teenager beim Zocken
  EN FP: teenagers playing football
  de FP: Teenager beim Fußballspielen
4452 | hurt (verb): to be the source of pain | loc: wehtun
  EN TS: That shin must really hurt!
  de TS: Das Schienbein muss echt wehtun!
  EN FS: That arm must really hurt!
  de FS: Der Arm muss echt wehtun!
  EN TP: a shin that hurts
  de TP: ein Schienbein, das wehtut
  EN FP: an arm that hurts
  de FP: ein Arm, der wehtut
4454 | tip (verb): to cause something to tilt | loc: kippen
  EN TS: She is tipping the apples out.
  de TS: Sie kippt die Äpfel aus.
  EN FS: She is tipping the eggs out.
  de FS: Sie kippt die Eier aus.
  EN TP: tipping a bucket of apples
  de TP: einen Eimer Äpfel auskippen
  EN FP: tipping the waiter
  de FP: dem Kellner Trinkgeld geben
4455 | site (noun): the piece of land where something is located | loc: Grundstück
  EN TS: He is working on the site.
  de TS: Er arbeitet auf dem Grundstück.
  EN FS: He is sleeping on the site.
  de FS: Er schläft auf dem Grundstück.
  EN TP: a building site
  de TP: ein Baugrundstück
  EN FP: a camping site
  de FP: ein Campingplatz
4456 | modern (adjective): belonging to the present, modern era | loc: modern
  EN TS: The tower is very modern.
  de TS: Der Turm ist sehr modern.
  EN FS: The tower is very old.
  de FS: Der Turm ist sehr alt.
  EN TP: a modern glass tower
  de TP: ein moderner Glasturm
  EN FP: a modern glass phone
  de FP: ein modernes Handy aus Glas
4457 | crouch (verb): to bend your knees down close to the ground | loc: kauern
  EN TS: She is crouching by the fire.
  de TS: Sie kauert am Feuer.
  EN FS: She is crouching by the car.
  de FS: Sie kauert am Auto.
  EN TP: crouching over a fire
  de TP: über einem Feuer kauern
  EN FP: crouching behind a rock
  de FP: hinter einem Felsen kauern
4458 | disaster (noun): a state of extreme ruin and misfortune | loc: Katastrophe
  EN TS: Total kitchen disaster!
  de TS: Totale Katastrophe in der Küche!
  EN FS: Total garden disaster!
  de FS: Totale Katastrophe im Garten!
  EN TP: a smoky kitchen disaster
  de TP: eine verqualmte Küchenkatastrophe
  EN FP: a natural disaster on TV
  de FP: eine Naturkatastrophe im Fernsehen
4459 | burning (noun): the act of burning something | loc: Verbrennen
  EN TS: A little burning, no problem.
  de TS: Ein bisschen Verbrennen gehört dazu, kein Problem.
  EN FS: A little rain, no problem.
  de FS: Ein bisschen Regen gehört dazu, kein Problem.
  EN TP: the burning of a marshmallow
  de TP: das Verbrennen eines Marshmallows
  EN FP: the burning of old letters
  de FP: das Verbrennen alter Briefe
4460 | palm (noun): the inner surface of the hand | loc: Handfläche
  EN TS: She is warming her palms.
  de TS: Sie wärmt sich die Handflächen.
  EN FS: She is warming her feet.
  de FS: Sie wärmt sich die Füße.
  EN TP: palms out to the fire
  de TP: Handflächen zum Feuer gestreckt
  EN FP: palm trees on the beach
  de FP: Palmen am Strand
4461 | dig (verb): to turn up or remove earth | loc: graben
  EN TS: They are digging. He can't escape.
  de TS: Sie graben. Er kann nicht entkommen.
  EN FS: They are swimming. He can't escape.
  de FS: Sie schwimmen. Er kann nicht entkommen.
  EN TP: digging in the sand
  de TP: im Sand graben
  EN FP: digging in the garden
  de FP: im Garten graben
4462 | funeral (noun): a ceremony where a dead person is buried | loc: Beerdigung
  EN TS: A white rose at the funeral.
  de TS: Eine weiße Rose bei der Beerdigung.
  EN FS: A red rose at the funeral.
  de FS: Eine rote Rose bei der Beerdigung.
  EN TP: a funeral in a cemetery
  de TP: eine Beerdigung auf dem Friedhof
  EN FP: a funeral in a church
  de FP: eine Beerdigung in der Kirche
4463 | welcome (verb): to greet someone on arrival | loc: begrüßen
  EN TS: The driver is welcoming them.
  de TS: Der Fahrer begrüßt sie.
  EN FS: The pilot is welcoming them.
  de FS: Der Pilot begrüßt sie.
  EN TP: welcoming people on a bus
  de TP: Leute im Bus begrüßen
  EN FP: welcoming people on a plane
  de FP: Leute im Flugzeug begrüßen
4464 | read (verb): to look at written words and understand them | loc: lesen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is reading, not waiting.
  de TS: Sie liest, sie wartet nicht.
  EN FS: She is eating, not waiting.
  de FS: Sie isst, sie wartet nicht.
  EN TP: reading at a bus stop
  de TP: an der Bushaltestelle lesen
  EN FP: reading on the train
  de FP: im Zug lesen
4465 | upstairs (adverb): on a floor above | loc: oben
  EN TS: He went upstairs, best day ever!
  de TS: Er ist nach oben gegangen, bester Tag ever!
  EN FS: He went downstairs, best day ever!
  de FS: Er ist nach unten gegangen, bester Tag ever!
  EN TP: upstairs on a bus
  de TP: oben im Bus
  EN FP: upstairs in a house
  de FP: oben im Haus
4466 | aboard (adverb): on a ship, train, plane or other vehicle | loc: an Bord
  EN TS: All aboard the tour bus!
  de TS: Alle an Bord des Tourbusses!
  EN FS: All aboard the ferry!
  de FS: Alle an Bord der Fähre!
  EN TP: aboard a city bus
  de TP: an Bord eines Stadtbusses
  EN FP: aboard a cruise ship
  de FP: an Bord eines Kreuzfahrtschiffs
4467 | ham (noun): meat from the thigh of a pig, usually smoked | loc: Schinken
  EN TS: Hams are hanging on the wall.
  de TS: Schinken hängen an der Wand.
  EN FS: Hats are hanging on the wall.
  de FS: Hüte hängen an der Wand.
  EN TP: whole hams on hooks
  de TP: ganze Schinken an Haken
  EN FP: a ham sandwich
  de FP: ein Schinkenbrot
4468 | porter (noun): a person employed to carry luggage | loc: Gepäckträger
  EN TS: The porter is carrying a lot.
  de TS: Der Gepäckträger trägt ganz schön viel.
  EN FS: The porter is holding nothing.
  de FS: Der Gepäckträger hält gar nichts.
  EN TP: a heavily loaded porter
  de TP: ein schwer beladener Gepäckträger
  EN FP: a porter at a hotel
  de FP: ein Gepäckträger im Hotel
4469 | cabinet (noun): a piece of furniture with doors and shelves | loc: Schrank
  EN TS: The cabinet is attacking him!
  de TS: Der Schrank greift ihn an!
  EN FS: The fridge is attacking him!
  de FS: Der Kühlschrank greift ihn an!
  EN TP: opening the kitchen cabinet
  de TP: den Küchenschrank öffnen
  EN FP: locking the kitchen cabinet
  de FP: den Küchenschrank abschließen
4470 | store (verb): to keep something for future use | loc: aufbewahren
  EN TS: Plates stored in colour order.
  de TS: Teller, nach Farben geordnet aufbewahrt.
  EN FS: Cups stored in colour order.
  de FS: Tassen, nach Farben geordnet aufbewahrt.
  EN TP: storing plates in a cupboard
  de TP: Teller im Schrank aufbewahren
  EN FP: storing files on a laptop
  de FP: Dateien auf dem Laptop speichern
4471 | height (noun): how tall something is, its vertical size | loc: Höhe
  EN TS: The pylon has a scary height!
  de TS: Der Mast hat eine furchterregende Höhe!
  EN FS: The bridge has a scary height!
  de FS: Die Brücke hat eine furchterregende Höhe!
  EN TP: the pylon's great height
  de TP: die große Höhe des Mastes
  EN FP: the height of a bridge
  de FP: die Höhe einer Brücke
4472 | altitude (noun): height above sea level | loc: Höhe
  EN TS: He can't believe the altitude!
  de TS: Er kann die Höhe nicht fassen!
  EN FS: He can't believe the heat!
  de FS: Er kann die Hitze nicht fassen!
  EN TP: a cable car at altitude
  de TP: eine Seilbahn in großer Höhe
  EN FP: the altitude of a plane
  de FP: die Flughöhe eines Flugzeugs
4473 | yell (verb): to give a sudden loud cry | loc: schreien
  EN TS: The cactus made him yell!
  de TS: Der Kaktus hat ihn zum Schreien gebracht!
  EN FS: The snake made him yell!
  de FS: Die Schlange hat ihn zum Schreien gebracht!
  EN TP: yelling in the desert
  de TP: in der Wüste schreien
  EN FP: yelling in the snow
  de FP: im Schnee schreien
4474 | menu (noun): a list of dishes available at a restaurant | loc: Speisekarte
  EN TS: The menu is on the wall.
  de TS: Die Speisekarte hängt an der Wand.
  EN FS: The menu is on the table.
  de FS: Die Speisekarte liegt auf dem Tisch.
  EN TP: a coffee menu on boards
  de TP: eine Speisekarte auf Tafeln
  EN FP: a menu on a phone
  de FP: eine Speisekarte auf dem Handy
4475 | display (verb): to show something, make it visible | loc: ausstellen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Cups are displayed on shelves.
  de TS: Tassen sind in Regalen ausgestellt.
  EN FS: Jars are displayed on shelves.
  de FS: Einmachgläser sind in Regalen ausgestellt.
  EN TP: cups displayed on shelves
  de TP: in Regalen ausgestellte Tassen
  EN FP: displaying a price list
  de FP: eine Preisliste aushängen
4476 | hall (noun): a large entrance or reception room | loc: Saal
  EN TS: What a huge cafe hall!
  de TS: Was für ein riesiger Café-Saal!
  EN FS: What a tiny cafe hall!
  de FS: Was für ein winziger Café-Saal!
  EN TP: a huge ornate hall
  de TP: ein riesiger verzierter Saal
  EN FP: a school sports hall
  de FP: eine Schulsporthalle
4477 | month (noun): one of the twelve parts of the year | loc: Monat
  EN TS: He is turning to a new month.
  de TS: Er blättert zum neuen Monat um.
  EN FS: He is turning to a new book.
  de FS: Er blättert in einem neuen Buch.
  EN TP: turning to a new month
  de TP: zum neuen Monat umblättern
  EN FP: a month at the beach
  de FP: ein Monat am Strand
4478 | date (noun): the specified day of the month | loc: Datum
  EN TS: She marked a date. Big day!
  de TS: Sie hat ein Datum markiert. Großer Tag!
  EN FS: She marked a name. Big day!
  de FS: Sie hat einen Namen markiert. Großer Tag!
  EN TP: a date marked in red
  de TP: ein rot markiertes Datum
  EN FP: a date at a restaurant
  de FP: ein Date im Restaurant
4479 | hard (adjective): not easy, needing great effort | loc: schwer
  EN TS: This ride is hard work!
  de TS: Diese Radeinheit ist echt schwer!
  EN FS: This ride is easy work!
  de FS: Diese Radeinheit ist echt leicht!
  EN TP: a hard spin class
  de TP: ein schwerer Spinning-Kurs
  EN FP: a hard bike seat
  de FP: ein harter Fahrradsattel
4480 | curve (noun): a line that bends, changing direction | loc: Kurve
  EN TS: The dune makes a long curve.
  de TS: Die Düne macht eine lange Kurve.
  EN FS: The river makes a long curve.
  de FS: Der Fluss macht eine lange Kurve.
  EN TP: the curve of a dune
  de TP: die Kurve einer Düne
  EN FP: a curve in the road
  de FP: eine Kurve in der Straße
4481 | focus (verb): to bring something to a central point | loc: fokussieren
  EN TS: She is focusing like a pro.
  de TS: Sie fokussiert wie ein Profi.
  EN FS: She is cooking like a pro.
  de FS: Sie kocht wie ein Profi.
  EN TP: to focus the lens
  de TP: das Objektiv fokussieren
  EN FP: to focus on homework
  de FP: sich auf Hausaufgaben fokussieren
4482 | shoot (verb): to make a film or photograph of something | loc: fotografieren
  EN TS: She is shooting the rooftops.
  de TS: Sie fotografiert die Dächer.
  EN FS: She is shooting the beach.
  de FS: Sie fotografiert den Strand.
  EN TP: shooting photos in the city
  de TP: in der Stadt fotografieren
  EN FP: shooting at a target
  de FP: auf eine Zielscheibe schießen
4483 | log (noun): a piece of a tree trunk with the branches cut off | loc: Baumstamm
  EN TS: The cabin is made of logs.
  de TS: Die Hütte ist aus Baumstämmen gebaut.
  EN FS: The cabin is made of bricks.
  de FS: Die Hütte ist aus Ziegeln gebaut.
  EN TP: a cabin of stacked logs
  de TP: eine Hütte aus Baumstämmen
  EN FP: a log on the ice
  de FP: ein Baumstamm auf dem Eis
4484 | dawn (noun): the first light of day | loc: Morgendämmerung
  EN TS: Dawn lights up the peaks first.
  de TS: Die Morgendämmerung beleuchtet zuerst die Gipfel.
  EN FS: Dawn lights up the trees first.
  de FS: Die Morgendämmerung beleuchtet zuerst die Bäume.
  EN TP: the first light of dawn
  de TP: das erste Licht der Morgendämmerung
  EN FP: dawn in a busy city
  de FP: Morgendämmerung in der Großstadt
4485 | powerful (adjective): having great power or force | loc: mächtig
  EN TS: Powerful falls, free shower!
  de TS: Mächtige Wasserfälle, Gratisdusche!
  EN FS: Powerful rain, free shower!
  de FS: Mächtiger Regen, Gratisdusche!
  EN TP: a powerful waterfall
  de TP: ein mächtiger Wasserfall
  EN FP: a powerful canoe engine
  de FP: ein mächtiger Kanumotor
4487 | kind (adjective): having a considerate and helpful nature | loc: freundlich
  EN TS: What a kind guy!
  de TS: Was für ein freundlicher Typ!
  EN FS: What a lazy guy!
  de FS: Was für ein fauler Typ!
  EN TP: a kind young man
  de TP: ein freundlicher junger Mann
  EN FP: a kind of pancake
  de FP: eine Art Pfannkuchen
4488 | document (noun): an official piece of writing with information | loc: Dokument
  EN TS: Every document gets a red X. Bad day at the office.
  de TS: Jedes Dokument bekommt ein rotes X. Schlechter Tag im Büro.
  EN FS: Every document gets a green tick. Bad day at the office.
  de FS: Jedes Dokument bekommt ein grünes Häkchen. Schlechter Tag im Büro.
  EN TP: stamping a document
  de TP: ein Dokument stempeln
  EN FP: printing a document
  de FP: ein Dokument ausdrucken
4489 | wax (noun): a soft substance from plant, animal or mineral | loc: Wachs
  EN TS: Melted wax is everywhere.
  de TS: Überall ist geschmolzenes Wachs.
  EN FS: Melted butter is everywhere.
  de FS: Überall ist geschmolzene Butter.
  EN TP: melted candle wax
  de TP: geschmolzenes Kerzenwachs
  EN FP: a wax figure
  de FP: eine Wachsfigur
4490 | prepare (verb): to make ready in advance | loc: vorbereiten | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is preparing the table.
  de TS: Sie bereitet den Tisch vor.
  EN FS: She is cleaning the table.
  de FS: Sie putzt den Tisch.
  EN TP: preparing a dinner table
  de TP: einen Esstisch vorbereiten
  EN FP: preparing for a test
  de FP: sich auf einen Test vorbereiten
4491 | below (adverb): in or to a lower place | loc: unten
  EN TS: The river is far below.
  de TS: Der Fluss ist weit unten.
  EN FS: The sun is far below.
  de FS: Die Sonne ist weit unten.
  EN TP: a river far below
  de TP: ein Fluss weit unten
  EN FP: clouds far below
  de FP: Wolken weit unten
4492 | impressive (adjective): making a strong impression | loc: beeindruckend
  EN TS: The golden dome is impressive.
  de TS: Die goldene Kuppel ist beeindruckend.
  EN FS: The silver dome is impressive.
  de FS: Die silberne Kuppel ist beeindruckend.
  EN TP: an impressive golden dome
  de TP: eine beeindruckende goldene Kuppel
  EN FP: an impressive exam result
  de FP: ein beeindruckendes Prüfungsergebnis
4493 | struggle (verb): to make a strenuous effort | loc: kämpfen
  EN TS: He is struggling at the wheel.
  de TS: Er kämpft am Steuer.
  EN FS: He is sleeping at the wheel.
  de FS: Er schläft am Steuer.
  EN TP: struggling with the wheel
  de TP: mit dem Steuer kämpfen
  EN FP: struggling with a heavy bag
  de FP: mit einer schweren Tasche kämpfen
4495 | cost (noun): the total spent for goods or services | loc: Kosten
  EN TS: The cost of the old car is 500 euros.
  de TS: Die Kosten für das alte Auto liegen bei 500 Euro.
  EN FS: The cost of the old car is 5,000 euros.
  de FS: Die Kosten für das alte Auto liegen bei 5.000 Euro.
  EN TP: the cost of a car
  de TP: die Kosten eines Autos
  EN FP: the cost of a flat
  de FP: die Kosten einer Wohnung
4496 | lay (verb): to put something in a certain place | loc: legen
  EN TS: He laid the rug on the floor.
  de TS: Er hat den Teppich auf den Boden gelegt.
  EN FS: He laid the rug on the bed.
  de FS: Er hat den Teppich aufs Bett gelegt.
  EN TP: to lay a rug down
  de TP: einen Teppich hinlegen
  EN FP: to lay the table
  de FP: den Tisch decken
4497 | hand (verb): to place something into someone's hands | loc: reichen
  EN TS: He is handing over a coin.
  de TS: Er reicht eine Münze rüber.
  EN FS: He is handing over a key.
  de FS: Er reicht einen Schlüssel rüber.
  EN TP: handing over the change
  de TP: das Wechselgeld reichen
  EN FP: handing over a gift
  de FP: ein Geschenk überreichen
4498 | sign (verb): to mark with your signature | loc: unterschreiben
  EN TS: Friends are signing his cast.
  de TS: Freunde unterschreiben auf seinem Gips.
  EN FS: Friends are signing his shirt.
  de FS: Freunde unterschreiben auf seinem Shirt.
  EN TP: signing a plaster cast
  de TP: auf einem Gips unterschreiben
  EN FP: signing a contract
  de FP: einen Vertrag unterschreiben
4499 | visit (verb): to go to see a place | loc: besuchen
  EN TS: Castles: he visits them all.
  de TS: Burgen: Er besucht sie alle.
  EN FS: Farms: he visits them all.
  de FS: Bauernhöfe: Er besucht sie alle.
  EN TP: visiting old castles
  de TP: alte Burgen besuchen
  EN FP: visiting old friends
  de FP: alte Freunde besuchen
4500 | quick (adjective): done rapidly, without delay | loc: schnell
  EN TS: Quick hands save the day.
  de TS: Schnelle Hände retten den Tag.
  EN FS: Quick dogs save the day.
  de FS: Schnelle Hunde retten den Tag.
  EN TP: a quick catch
  de TP: ein schneller Fang
  EN FP: a quick nap
  de FP: ein schnelles Nickerchen
4501 | insect (noun): a small air-breathing creature with six legs | loc: Insekt
  EN TS: This insect had a snack.
  de TS: Dieses Insekt hatte einen Snack.
  EN FS: This bird had a snack.
  de FS: Dieser Vogel hatte einen Snack.
  EN TP: an insect on a leaf
  de TP: ein Insekt auf einem Blatt
  EN FP: an insect on a flower
  de FP: ein Insekt auf einer Blume
4502 | ceiling (noun): the upper surface of a room, overhead | loc: Decke
  EN TS: Ceilings are so interesting.
  de TS: Decken sind soooo interessant.
  EN FS: Floors are so interesting.
  de FS: Fußböden sind soooo interessant.
  EN TP: looking up at the ceiling
  de TP: zur Decke hochschauen
  EN FP: painting the ceiling
  de FP: die Decke streichen
4503 | wish (verb): to hope for something | loc: wünschen
  EN TS: She is making a wish.
  de TS: Sie wünscht sich etwas.
  EN FS: She is making a cake.
  de FS: Sie backt einen Kuchen.
  EN TP: making a birthday wish
  de TP: sich zum Geburtstag etwas wünschen
  EN FP: wishing for rain
  de FP: sich Regen wünschen
4504 | success (noun): an event that achieves its intended purpose | loc: Erfolg
  EN TS: What a success!
  de TS: Was für ein Erfolg!
  EN FS: What a failure!
  de FS: Was für eine Pleite!
  EN TP: celebrating a big success
  de TP: einen großen Erfolg feiern
  EN FP: a success on stage
  de FP: ein Erfolg auf der Bühne
4505 | backwards (adverb): toward the back or rear | loc: rückwärts
  EN TS: He is falling over backwards!
  de TS: Er kippt rückwärts um!
  EN FS: He is falling over forwards!
  de FS: Er kippt vorwärts um!
  EN TP: falling backwards off a chair
  de TP: rückwärts vom Stuhl fallen
  EN FP: walking backwards to the table
  de FP: rückwärts zum Tisch gehen
4506 | comfort (noun): a relaxed state with no pain | loc: Behaglichkeit
  EN TS: Comfort? The green chair wins.
  de TS: Behaglichkeit? Der grüne Sessel gewinnt.
  EN FS: Comfort? The white chair wins.
  de FS: Behaglichkeit? Der weiße Sessel gewinnt.
  EN TP: comfort in a big armchair
  de TP: Behaglichkeit in einem großen Sessel
  EN FP: comfort on a kitchen chair
  de FP: Behaglichkeit auf einem Küchenstuhl
4507 | tag (noun): a label attached to something, showing its owner | loc: Anhänger
  EN TS: The agent is attaching a tag.
  de TS: Der Mitarbeiter bringt einen Anhänger an.
  EN FS: The agent is attaching a lock.
  de FS: Der Mitarbeiter bringt ein Schloss an.
  EN TP: a tag on a suitcase
  de TP: ein Anhänger am Koffer
  EN FP: a jacket name tag
  de FP: ein Namensschild an der Jacke
4508 | load (verb): to fill or place a load on something | loc: laden | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He's loading bags like a boss.
  de TS: Er lädt Taschen wie ein Boss.
  EN FS: He's loading food like a boss.
  de FS: Er lädt Essen wie ein Boss.
  EN TP: loading bags onto the belt
  de TP: Taschen aufs Band laden
  EN FP: loading a truck with boxes
  de FP: einen Lkw mit Kisten beladen
4509 | weigh (verb): to have a certain weight | loc: wiegen
  EN TS: The bag weighs 12.95 kg. Accepted.
  de TS: Die Tasche wiegt 12,95 kg. Akzeptiert.
  EN FS: The bag weighs 21.95 kg. Accepted.
  de FS: Die Tasche wiegt 21,95 kg. Akzeptiert.
  EN TP: weighing a bag
  de TP: eine Tasche wiegen
  EN FP: weighing the fruit
  de FP: das Obst wiegen
4510 | check (verb): to examine something to see if it is right | loc: prüfen
  EN TS: She is checking her ticket. Wrong gate?
  de TS: Sie prüft ihr Ticket. Falsches Gate?
  EN FS: She is checking her phone. Wrong gate?
  de FS: Sie prüft ihr Handy. Falsches Gate?
  EN TP: checking the flight board
  de TP: die Abflugtafel prüfen
  EN FP: checking her bag
  de FP: ihre Tasche prüfen
4511 | service (noun): work done by one person that benefits another | loc: Service
  EN TS: The service here is excellent.
  de TS: Der Service hier ist top.
  EN FS: The service here is rude.
  de FS: Der Service hier ist unhöflich.
  EN TP: friendly service at a desk
  de TP: freundlicher Service am Schalter
  EN FP: room service in a hotel
  de FP: Zimmerservice im Hotel
4512 | list (noun): an ordered set of names or items | loc: Liste
  EN TS: He is checking his list.
  de TS: Er checkt seine Liste.
  EN FS: He is checking his phone.
  de FS: Er checkt sein Handy.
  EN TP: ticking off a list
  de TP: eine Liste abhaken
  EN FP: writing a shopping list
  de FP: eine Einkaufsliste schreiben
4513 | suitcase (noun): a large case with a handle for carrying clothes | loc: Koffer
  EN TS: All good: suitcase and ticket.
  de TS: Alles gut: Koffer und Ticket.
  EN FS: All good: backpack and ticket.
  de FS: Alles gut: Rucksack und Ticket.
  EN TP: a suitcase at the airport
  de TP: ein Koffer am Flughafen
  EN FP: a suitcase on a train
  de FP: ein Koffer im Zug
4514 | skill (noun): an ability you gain by training | loc: Fähigkeit
  EN TS: The chef has crazy skills.
  de TS: Der Koch hat krasse Fähigkeiten.
  EN FS: The waiter has crazy skills.
  de FS: Der Kellner hat krasse Fähigkeiten.
  EN TP: a chef's cooking skill
  de TP: die Fähigkeiten eines Kochs
  EN FP: a juggling skill
  de FP: Jonglier-Fähigkeiten
4515 | to win (verb): to be the winner in a contest | loc: gewinnen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He won a medal. You bet!
  de TS: Er hat eine Medaille gewonnen. Na klar!
  EN FS: He won a cup. You bet!
  de FS: Er hat einen Pokal gewonnen. Na klar!
  EN TP: to win a medal
  de TP: eine Medaille gewinnen
  EN FP: to win a car
  de FP: ein Auto gewinnen
4516 | hay (noun): dried grass used as food for animals | loc: Heu
  EN TS: The barn floor is full of hay.
  de TS: Der Scheunenboden ist voller Heu.
  EN FS: The barn floor is full of mud.
  de FS: Der Scheunenboden ist voller Schlamm.
  EN TP: a nest made of hay
  de TP: ein Nest aus Heu
  EN FP: hay bales on a truck
  de FP: Heuballen auf einem Lkw
4517 | pull (noun): the act of pulling something toward you | loc: Zug
  EN TS: He is giving the rope a pull.
  de TS: Er macht einen kräftigen Zug am Seil.
  EN FS: He is giving the rope a cut.
  de FS: Er macht einen kräftigen Schnitt ins Seil.
  EN TP: a pull on the rope
  de TP: ein Zug am Seil
  EN FP: the pull of the moon
  de FP: die Anziehungskraft des Mondes
4519 | ash (noun): what remains when something is burned | loc: Asche
  EN TS: He's stacking logs on the ash.
  de TS: Er stapelt Holzscheite auf die Asche.
  EN FS: He's stacking logs on the rug.
  de FS: Er stapelt Holzscheite auf den Teppich.
  EN TP: a thick bed of ash
  de TP: eine dicke Schicht Asche
  EN FP: an old ash tree
  de FP: eine alte Esche
4520 | stretch (verb): to spread over a large, long area | loc: sich erstrecken
  EN TS: The wall stretches forever.
  de TS: Die Mauer erstreckt sich endlos.
  EN FS: The river stretches forever.
  de FS: Der Fluss erstreckt sich endlos.
  EN TP: stretching over the mountains
  de TP: sich über die Berge erstrecken
  EN FP: stretching before a run
  de FP: sich vor dem Laufen dehnen
4521 | distance (noun): a far away region | loc: Ferne
  EN TS: Towers fade in the distance.
  de TS: Türme verschwinden in der Ferne.
  EN FS: Houses fade in the distance.
  de FS: Häuser verschwinden in der Ferne.
  EN TP: towers in the distance
  de TP: Türme in der Ferne
  EN FP: a long-distance phone call
  de FP: ein Ferngespräch
4522 | tour (noun): a journey all the way around a place | loc: Rundreise
  EN TS: Her tour has a wall, a boat and dumplings!
  de TS: Ihre Rundreise: Mauer, Boot und Teigtaschen!
  EN FS: Her tour has a wall, a boat and pizza!
  de FS: Ihre Rundreise: Mauer, Boot und Pizza!
  EN TP: a tour of China
  de TP: eine Rundreise durch China
  EN FP: a tour of Italy
  de FP: eine Rundreise durch Italien
4524 | fold (verb): to bend so that one part covers the other | loc: falten
  EN TS: Perfectly folded dumplings.
  de TS: Perfekt gefaltete Teigtaschen.
  EN FS: Perfectly folded napkins.
  de FS: Perfekt gefaltete Servietten.
  EN TP: folding dumpling edges
  de TP: Ränder von Teigtaschen falten
  EN FP: folding clean laundry
  de FP: saubere Wäsche falten
4525 | help (verb): to give help or assistance to someone | loc: helfen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She helped him breathe again.
  de TS: Sie hat ihm geholfen, wieder zu atmen.
  EN FS: She helped him stand up again.
  de FS: Sie hat ihm geholfen, wieder aufzustehen.
  EN TP: helping a choking man
  de TP: einem sich verschluckenden Mann helfen
  EN FP: helping with the dishes
  de FP: beim Abwasch helfen
4526 | election (noun): a vote to choose a winner for a position | loc: Wahl
  EN TS: She is thinking very hard about this election.
  de TS: Sie denkt sehr angestrengt über diese Wahl nach.
  EN FS: He is thinking very hard about this election.
  de FS: Er denkt sehr angestrengt über diese Wahl nach.
  EN TP: voting in an election
  de TP: bei einer Wahl abstimmen
  EN FP: winning an election
  de FP: eine Wahl gewinnen
4527 | vegetable (noun): a plant part you eat, like roots, leaves or stems | loc: Gemüse
  EN TS: He is chopping vegetables!
  de TS: Er schneidet Gemüse!
  EN FS: He is chopping meat!
  de FS: Er schneidet Fleisch!
  EN TP: chopping vegetables
  de TP: Gemüse schneiden
  EN FP: washing vegetables
  de FP: Gemüse waschen
4528 | grave (noun): a place in the ground where a dead body is buried | loc: Grab | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Old graves surround the church.
  de TS: Alte Gräber umgeben die Kirche.
  EN FS: Old graves surround the castle.
  de FS: Alte Gräber umgeben die Burg.
  EN TP: graves around a church
  de TP: Gräber rund um eine Kirche
  EN FP: graves on a battlefield
  de FP: Gräber auf einem Schlachtfeld
4529 | color (noun): what things look like from the light they reflect | loc: Farbe
  EN TS: Floor full of color. Magic!
  de TS: Der Boden voller Farbe. Magie!
  EN FS: Floor full of water. Magic!
  de FS: Der Boden voller Wasser. Magie!
  EN TP: colors on a stone floor
  de TP: Farben auf einem Steinboden
  EN FP: colors on a painted wall
  de FP: Farben auf einer bemalten Wand
4530 | film (noun): a story told with moving pictures and sound | loc: Film
  EN TS: Popcorn is flying at the film!
  de TS: Beim Film fliegt Popcorn!
  EN FS: Drinks are flying at the film!
  de FS: Beim Film fliegen Getränke!
  EN TP: watching a film
  de TP: einen Film schauen
  EN FP: making a film
  de FP: einen Film drehen
4531 | popcorn (noun): corn heated until it bursts into white pieces | loc: Popcorn
  EN TS: She is ready with her popcorn.
  de TS: Mit Popcorn ist sie bereit.
  EN FS: She is ready with her pizza.
  de FS: Mit Pizza ist sie bereit.
  EN TP: a big tub of popcorn
  de TP: ein großer Eimer Popcorn
  EN FP: making popcorn at home
  de FP: Popcorn zu Hause machen
4532 | trash (noun): worthless material to be thrown away | loc: Müll
  EN TS: Park duty: picking up trash.
  de TS: Parkdienst: Müll aufsammeln.
  EN FS: Park duty: picking up flowers.
  de FS: Parkdienst: Blumen aufsammeln.
  EN TP: picking up park trash
  de TP: Müll im Park aufsammeln
  EN FP: a full trash can
  de FP: eine volle Mülltonne
4533 | court (noun): a room in which a law court sits | loc: Gerichtssaal
  EN TS: They are celebrating in court.
  de TS: Sie feiern im Gerichtssaal.
  EN FS: They are crying in court.
  de FS: Sie weinen im Gerichtssaal.
  EN TP: a happy family in court
  de TP: eine glückliche Familie im Gerichtssaal
  EN FP: a tennis court party
  de FP: eine Party auf dem Tennisplatz
4534 | official (noun): a worker who holds an office | loc: Beamter
  EN TS: The official wears a chain.
  de TS: Der Beamte trägt eine Kette.
  EN FS: The official wears a crown.
  de FS: Der Beamte trägt eine Krone.
  EN TP: an official with a chain
  de TP: ein Beamter mit Amtskette
  EN FP: an official stamping passports
  de FP: ein Beamter beim Passstempeln
4535 | lesson (noun): a unit of instruction | loc: Unterrichtsstunde
  EN TS: He is throwing paper during the lesson!
  de TS: Er wirft in der Unterrichtsstunde mit Papier!
  EN FS: He is throwing chalk during the lesson!
  de FS: Er wirft in der Unterrichtsstunde mit Kreide!
  EN TP: a math lesson
  de TP: eine Unterrichtsstunde in Mathe
  EN FP: a swimming lesson
  de FP: eine Schwimmstunde
4536 | craft (noun): the skilled practice of a practical job | loc: Handwerk
  EN TS: The craft here is pottery.
  de TS: Das Handwerk hier ist Töpfern.
  EN FS: The craft here is painting.
  de FS: Das Handwerk hier ist Malen.
  EN TP: the craft of pottery
  de TP: das Handwerk des Töpferns
  EN FP: the craft of glassmaking
  de FP: das Handwerk der Glasbläserei
4537 | clear (verb): to rid a place of obstructions | loc: räumen
  EN TS: She cleared the whole flat. Then she collapsed.
  de TS: Sie hat die ganze Wohnung geräumt. Dann ist sie zusammengebrochen.
  EN FS: She cleared the whole flat. Then she danced.
  de FS: Sie hat die ganze Wohnung geräumt. Dann hat sie getanzt.
  EN TP: clearing the shelves
  de TP: die Regale leer räumen
  EN FP: clearing her throat
  de FP: sich räuspern
4538 | rest (noun): freedom from work or activity | loc: Ruhe
  EN TS: Task done. Time for a rest.
  de TS: Aufgabe erledigt. Zeit für etwas Ruhe.
  EN FS: Task done. Time for a run.
  de FS: Aufgabe erledigt. Zeit für einen Lauf.
  EN TP: a rest on the sofa
  de TP: Ruhe auf dem Sofa
  EN FP: a highway rest stop
  de FP: ein Rastplatz an der Autobahn
4539 | cartoon (noun): a humorous drawing in a newspaper | loc: Karikatur
  EN TS: The cartoon man is mopping.
  de TS: Der Mann in der Karikatur wischt.
  EN FS: The cartoon man is cooking.
  de FS: Der Mann in der Karikatur kocht.
  EN TP: a cartoon of a cleaner
  de TP: eine Karikatur einer Putzkraft
  EN FP: a cartoon of a cook
  de FP: eine Karikatur eines Kochs
4540 | equipment (noun): the things needed to do a job or service | loc: Ausrüstung
  EN TS: Proper safety equipment.
  de TS: Ordentliche Sicherheitsausrüstung.
  EN FS: Proper diving equipment.
  de FS: Ordentliche Tauchausrüstung.
  EN TP: window-cleaning equipment
  de TP: Ausrüstung zum Fensterputzen
  EN FP: gym equipment in a hall
  de FP: Ausrüstung in einer Turnhalle
4541 | filthy (adjective): disgustingly dirty | loc: dreckig
  EN TS: The sink was filthy with hair!
  de TS: Das Waschbecken war dreckig und voller Haare!
  EN FS: The sink was filthy with mud!
  de FS: Das Waschbecken war dreckig und voller Schlamm!
  EN TP: a filthy hairy basin
  de TP: ein dreckiges, haariges Becken
  EN FP: filthy boots by the door
  de FP: dreckige Stiefel an der Tür
4542 | agreement (noun): a statement of promises exchanged | loc: Vereinbarung
  EN TS: They reached an agreement.
  de TS: Sie haben eine Vereinbarung erzielt.
  EN FS: They reached the airport.
  de FS: Sie haben den Flughafen erreicht.
  EN TP: shaking hands on an agreement
  de TP: Handschlag auf eine Vereinbarung
  EN FP: a rental agreement
  de FP: ein Mietvertrag
4543 | risk (noun): a source of danger, a chance of loss | loc: Risiko
  EN TS: That thin rope is a tiny risk.
  de TS: Das dünne Seil ist ein winziges Risiko.
  EN FS: That ladder is a tiny risk.
  de FS: Die Leiter ist ein winziges Risiko.
  EN TP: risk on a sea cliff
  de TP: Risiko an einer Steilküste
  EN FP: risk in a casino
  de FP: Risiko im Casino
4544 | contrast (noun): the difference between things that are compared | loc: Kontrast
  EN TS: Sand and ice. Small contrast.
  de TS: Sand und Eis. Kleiner Kontrast.
  EN FS: Sea and ice. Small contrast.
  de FS: Meer und Eis. Kleiner Kontrast.
  EN TP: sand and ice in contrast
  de TP: Sand und Eis im Kontrast
  EN FP: day and night in contrast
  de FP: Tag und Nacht im Kontrast
4545 | strength (noun): being physically or mentally strong | loc: Kraft
  EN TS: She has huge finger strength.
  de TS: Sie hat enorme Kraft in den Fingern.
  EN FS: He has huge finger strength.
  de FS: Er hat enorme Kraft in den Fingern.
  EN TP: strength in her fingers
  de TP: Kraft in ihren Fingern
  EN FP: strength in her legs
  de FP: Kraft in ihren Beinen
4546 | surgery (noun): a room where you see a doctor or dentist | loc: Praxis
  EN TS: The surgery has a green couch.
  de TS: Die Praxis hat eine grüne Liege.
  EN FS: The surgery has a red couch.
  de FS: Die Praxis hat eine rote Liege.
  EN TP: a boy in the surgery
  de TP: ein Junge in der Praxis
  EN FP: a boy having surgery
  de FP: ein Junge bei einer OP
4547 | waiting room (noun): a room with seats where people wait | loc: Wartezimmer
  EN TS: They are in the waiting room.
  de TS: Sie sind im Wartezimmer.
  EN FS: They are in the dining room.
  de FS: Sie sind im Esszimmer.
  EN TP: sitting in a waiting room
  de TP: im Wartezimmer sitzen
  EN FP: sitting in a living room
  de FP: im Wohnzimmer sitzen
4548 | late (adverb): later than usual or expected | loc: spät
  EN TS: Oh no, he woke up late!
  de TS: Oh nein, er ist zu spät aufgewacht!
  EN FS: Oh no, he woke up early!
  de FS: Oh nein, er ist zu früh aufgewacht!
  EN TP: waking up late
  de TP: spät aufwachen
  EN FP: working late
  de FP: bis spät arbeiten
4549 | fuel (noun): a substance burned to produce energy | loc: Brennstoff
  EN TS: He is shovelling fuel.
  de TS: Er schaufelt Brennstoff.
  EN FS: He is shovelling snow.
  de FS: Er schaufelt Schnee.
  EN TP: shovelling black fuel
  de TP: schwarzen Brennstoff schaufeln
  EN FP: fuel for a rocket
  de FP: Treibstoff für eine Rakete
4550 | finally (adverb): after a long delay, at last | loc: endlich
  EN TS: Finally, coffee. She is alive.
  de TS: Endlich Kaffee. Sie lebt wieder.
  EN FS: Finally, tea. She is alive.
  de FS: Endlich Tee. Sie lebt wieder.
  EN TP: finally drinking coffee
  de TP: endlich Kaffee trinken
  EN FP: finally going to bed
  de FP: endlich ins Bett gehen
4551 | camp (verb): to live in a tent | loc: zelten
  EN TS: Cheap tent. Great camping!
  de TS: Billiges Zelt. Super zum Zelten!
  EN FS: Cheap car. Great camping!
  de FS: Billiges Auto. Super zum Zelten!
  EN TP: camping by a lake
  de TP: am See zelten
  EN FP: camping in the snow
  de FP: im Schnee zelten
4553 | hair (noun): the threadlike growth covering the head | loc: Haare
  EN TS: One brush for her hair, then the same one for the dog.
  de TS: Eine Bürste für ihre Haare, dann dieselbe für den Hund.
  EN FS: One brush for her hair, then the same one for the cat.
  de FS: Eine Bürste für ihre Haare, dann dieselbe für die Katze.
  EN TP: brushing long dark hair
  de TP: lange dunkle Haare bürsten
  EN FP: dog hair on a sofa
  de FP: Hundehaare auf dem Sofa
4554 | flame (noun): the bright burning part of a fire or candle | loc: Flamme
  EN TS: A wall of flame, and he keeps cooking.
  de TS: Eine Wand aus Flammen, und er kocht weiter.
  EN FS: A wall of water, and he keeps cooking.
  de FS: Eine Wand aus Wasser, und er kocht weiter.
  EN TP: a wall of orange flame
  de TP: eine Wand aus orangen Flammen
  EN FP: a candle flame at dinner
  de FP: eine Kerzenflamme beim Abendessen
4555 | pine (noun): a tall evergreen tree with needles | loc: Kiefer
  EN TS: Pines below, peaks ahead.
  de TS: Kiefern unten, Gipfel vorn.
  EN FS: Palms below, peaks ahead.
  de FS: Palmen unten, Gipfel vorn.
  EN TP: rows of snowy pines
  de TP: Reihen verschneiter Kiefern
  EN FP: a pine kitchen table
  de FP: ein Küchentisch aus Kiefer
4556 | praise (verb): to express approval of someone | loc: loben
  EN TS: The whole team is praising him.
  de TS: Das ganze Team lobt ihn.
  EN FS: The whole team is ignoring him.
  de FS: Das ganze Team ignoriert ihn.
  EN TP: praising a colleague
  de TP: einen Kollegen loben
  EN FP: praising a dog
  de FP: einen Hund loben
4557 | lap (noun): the top of your thighs when you sit | loc: Schoß
  EN TS: The dog stole his lap!
  de TS: Der Hund hat seinen Schoß geklaut!
  EN FS: The cat stole his lap!
  de FS: Die Katze hat seinen Schoß geklaut!
  EN TP: a dog on his lap
  de TP: ein Hund auf seinem Schoß
  EN FP: a lap around the track
  de FP: eine Runde auf der Bahn
4558 | support (noun): help given to a person or cause | loc: Unterstützung
  EN TS: His friends are his support.
  de TS: Seine Freunde sind seine Unterstützung.
  EN FS: His parents are his support.
  de FS: Seine Eltern sind seine Unterstützung.
  EN TP: support from friends
  de TP: Unterstützung von Freunden
  EN FP: support from his parents
  de FP: Unterstützung von seinen Eltern
4559 | console (verb): to give emotional strength to someone sad | loc: trösten
  EN TS: Friends are consoling him.
  de TS: Freunde trösten ihn.
  EN FS: Friends are teasing him.
  de FS: Freunde ärgern ihn.
  EN TP: consoling a crying friend
  de TP: einen weinenden Freund trösten
  EN FP: playing on a console
  de FP: auf einer Konsole zocken
4560 | crew (noun): the men and women who run a ship or aircraft | loc: Besatzung
  EN TS: The crew is rowing in time.
  de TS: Die Besatzung rudert im Takt.
  EN FS: The crew is singing in time.
  de FS: Die Besatzung singt im Takt.
  EN TP: a rowing crew
  de TP: eine rudernde Besatzung
  EN FP: a film crew
  de FP: eine Filmcrew
4561 | command (noun): an instruction with authority to do something | loc: Befehl
  EN TS: She is shouting commands.
  de TS: Sie brüllt Befehle.
  EN FS: She is whispering commands.
  de FS: Sie flüstert Befehle.
  EN TP: shouting commands
  de TP: Befehle brüllen
  EN FP: typing commands
  de FP: Befehle eintippen
4562 | direction (noun): the line leading to a place | loc: Richtung
  EN TS: She is checking the direction. Serious face.
  de TS: Sie checkt die Richtung. Ernstes Gesicht.
  EN FS: She is checking the time. Serious face.
  de FS: Sie checkt die Uhrzeit. Ernstes Gesicht.
  EN TP: finding the right direction
  de TP: die richtige Richtung finden
  EN FP: asking for directions
  de FP: nach dem Weg fragen
4563 | law (noun): a legal document of rules for an activity | loc: Gesetz
  EN TS: The law book has gold corners.
  de TS: Das Gesetzbuch hat goldene Ecken.
  EN FS: The law book has iron corners.
  de FS: Das Gesetzbuch hat eiserne Ecken.
  EN TP: a huge book of law
  de TP: ein riesiges Buch voller Gesetze
  EN FP: breaking the law
  de FP: das Gesetz brechen
4564 | cooperation (noun): working together, joint action | loc: Zusammenarbeit
  EN TS: The barn needs cooperation.
  de TS: Die Scheune braucht Zusammenarbeit.
  EN FS: The boat needs cooperation.
  de FS: Das Boot braucht Zusammenarbeit.
  EN TP: cooperation at a barn raising
  de TP: Zusammenarbeit beim Scheunenbau
  EN FP: cooperation between countries
  de FP: Zusammenarbeit zwischen Ländern
4565 | globe (noun): an object shaped like a ball | loc: Kugel
  EN TS: The Earth looks like a globe.
  de TS: Die Erde sieht aus wie eine Kugel.
  EN FS: The Moon looks like a globe.
  de FS: Der Mond sieht aus wie eine Kugel.
  EN TP: a blue and green globe
  de TP: eine blau-grüne Kugel
  EN FP: a globe on a desk
  de FP: ein Globus auf dem Schreibtisch
4566 | summit (noun): the top point of a mountain or hill | loc: Gipfel
  EN TS: She is reaching the summit!
  de TS: Sie erreicht den Gipfel!
  EN FS: She is reaching the river!
  de FS: Sie erreicht den Fluss!
  EN TP: reaching the summit
  de TP: den Gipfel erreichen
  EN FP: a summit of world leaders
  de FP: ein Gipfel der Staatschefs
4567 | ill (adjective): affected by a physical or mental problem | loc: krank
  EN TS: She looks a bit ill.
  de TS: Sie sieht ein bisschen krank aus.
  EN FS: She looks very happy.
  de FS: Sie sieht sehr glücklich aus.
  EN TP: ill and coughing
  de TP: krank und hustend
  EN FP: ill in bed
  de FP: krank im Bett
4568 | continent (noun): one of the large landmasses of the earth | loc: Kontinent
  EN TS: She is jumping on every continent. Cheap travel!
  de TS: Sie springt auf jedem Kontinent. Billig reisen!
  EN FS: He is jumping on every continent. Cheap travel!
  de FS: Er springt auf jedem Kontinent. Billig reisen!
  EN TP: jumping on a continent
  de TP: auf einem Kontinent springen
  EN FP: drawing a continent
  de FP: einen Kontinent zeichnen
4569 | to fry (verb): to cook food in hot oil in a pan | loc: braten | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is frying fish. Van life!
  de TS: Er brät Fisch. Vanlife!
  EN FS: He is frying eggs. Van life!
  de FS: Er brät Eier. Vanlife!
  EN TP: frying fish in a van
  de TP: Fisch im Van braten
  EN FP: frying fish on a boat
  de FP: Fisch auf einem Boot braten
4570 | chef (noun): a professional cook | loc: Chefkoch
  EN TS: The chef is plating pork.
  de TS: Der Chefkoch richtet Schweinefleisch an.
  EN FS: The chef is plating fish.
  de FS: Der Chefkoch richtet Fisch an.
  EN TP: a chef plating a dish
  de TP: ein Chefkoch beim Anrichten
  EN FP: a chef eating a dish
  de FP: ein Chefkoch beim Essen
4571 | push (verb): to move something with force | loc: schieben
  EN TS: Everyone is pushing the boat.
  de TS: Alle schieben das Boot.
  EN FS: Everyone is pushing the car.
  de FS: Alle schieben das Auto.
  EN TP: pushing a boat to sea
  de TP: ein Boot ins Meer schieben
  EN FP: pushing a car uphill
  de FP: ein Auto bergauf schieben
4572 | correct (verb): to make something right | loc: korrigieren
  EN TS: She will correct them forever.
  de TS: Sie wird sie ewig korrigieren.
  EN FS: He will correct them forever.
  de FS: Er wird sie ewig korrigieren.
  EN TP: correcting exam papers
  de TP: Klausuren korrigieren
  EN FP: correcting her posture
  de FP: ihre Haltung korrigieren
4573 | secret (adjective): kept private, not open or public | loc: geheim
  EN TS: A secret deal over cash.
  de TS: Ein geheimer Deal mit Bargeld.
  EN FS: A secret deal over coffee.
  de FS: Ein geheimer Deal mit Kaffee.
  EN TP: a secret cash deal
  de TP: ein geheimer Bargeld-Deal
  EN FP: a secret love letter
  de FP: ein geheimer Liebesbrief
4575 | cold (noun): a mild viral infection of the nose and throat | loc: Erkältung
  EN TS: Her cold came to the library.
  de TS: Ihre Erkältung ist mit in die Bibliothek gekommen.
  EN FS: Her cold came to the cinema.
  de FS: Ihre Erkältung ist mit ins Kino gekommen.
  EN TP: a cold in the library
  de TP: eine Erkältung in der Bibliothek
  EN FP: a cold in the snow
  de FP: eine Erkältung im Schnee
4576 | count (verb): to find out the number or amount of something | loc: zählen
  EN TS: She is counting a mountain of paper.
  de TS: Sie zählt einen Berg Papier.
  EN FS: She is counting a mountain of coins.
  de FS: Sie zählt einen Berg Münzen.
  EN TP: counting sheets of paper
  de TP: Blätter Papier zählen
  EN FP: counting coins on a table
  de FP: Münzen auf einem Tisch zählen
4577 | country (noun): the territory of a nation | loc: Land
  EN TS: She is showing us her country.
  de TS: Sie zeigt uns ihr Land.
  EN FS: She is showing us her ship.
  de FS: Sie zeigt uns ihr Schiff.
  EN TP: a country of fields
  de TP: ein Land voller Felder
  EN FP: a country house
  de FP: ein Landhaus
4578 | crop (noun): what plants yield in one growing season | loc: Ernte
  EN TS: Crop fields form a patchwork.
  de TS: Die Ernte auf den Feldern bildet ein Flickenmuster.
  EN FS: Car parks form a patchwork.
  de FS: Die Parkplätze bilden ein Flickenmuster.
  EN TP: fields of green crops
  de TP: grüne Felder vor der Ernte
  EN FP: a crop of apples
  de FP: eine Apfelernte
4579 | abroad (adverb): to or in a foreign country | loc: im Ausland
  EN TS: She travels abroad a lot!
  de TS: Sie ist ständig im Ausland unterwegs!
  EN FS: She stays at home a lot!
  de FS: Sie ist ständig zu Hause!
  EN TP: travelling abroad
  de TP: im Ausland reisen
  EN FP: studying abroad
  de FP: im Ausland studieren
4580 | date (noun): a meeting arranged in advance | loc: Date
  EN TS: Their date has one milkshake.
  de TS: Bei ihrem Date gibt's nur einen Milchshake.
  EN FS: Their date has one pizza.
  de FS: Bei ihrem Date gibt's nur eine Pizza.
  EN TP: a milkshake date
  de TP: ein Milchshake-Date
  EN FP: the date on a calendar
  de FP: das Datum im Kalender
4581 | candy (noun): a sweet made of flavored sugar | loc: Bonbon
  EN TS: A blanket den full of candy.
  de TS: Eine Deckenhöhle voller Bonbons.
  EN FS: A blanket den full of books.
  de FS: Eine Deckenhöhle voller Bücher.
  EN TP: a bowl of candy
  de TP: eine Schale Bonbons
  EN FP: a candy shop window
  de FP: das Schaufenster eines Bonbonladens
4582 | measure (verb): to find the size or measurements of something | loc: messen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: An adult is measuring them.
  de TS: Ein Erwachsener misst sie.
  EN FS: An adult is feeding them.
  de FS: Ein Erwachsener füttert sie.
  EN TP: to measure who is taller
  de TP: messen, wer größer ist
  EN FP: to measure a room
  de FP: einen Raum ausmessen
4583 | calf (noun): the thick muscle at the back of your lower leg | loc: Wade
  EN TS: Ouch! He is holding his calf.
  de TS: Au! Er hält sich die Wade.
  EN FS: Ouch! He is holding his head.
  de FS: Au! Er hält sich den Kopf.
  EN TP: a cramp in his calf
  de TP: ein Krampf in der Wade
  EN FP: a calf in a field
  de FP: ein Kalb auf der Weide
4584 | trail (noun): a track or mark left by something passing | loc: Spur
  EN TS: The turtle left a trail.
  de TS: Die Schildkröte hat eine Spur hinterlassen.
  EN FS: The crab left a trail.
  de FS: Die Krabbe hat eine Spur hinterlassen.
  EN TP: a trail of flipper prints
  de TP: eine Spur von Flossenabdrücken
  EN FP: a hiking trail
  de FP: ein Wanderweg
4585 | crossing (noun): traveling across something | loc: Überquerung
  EN TS: Beret, baguette, stylish crossing.
  de TS: Baskenmütze, Baguette, stylische Überquerung.
  EN FS: Beret, guitar, stylish crossing.
  de FS: Baskenmütze, Gitarre, stylische Überquerung.
  EN TP: a crossing with a baguette
  de TP: eine Überquerung mit Baguette
  EN FP: a border crossing by car
  de FP: ein Grenzübergang mit dem Auto
4586 | crosswalk (noun): the striped part of a road for crossing | loc: Zebrastreifen
  EN TS: She is on the crosswalk.
  de TS: Sie ist auf dem Zebrastreifen.
  EN FS: She is on the bridge.
  de FS: Sie ist auf der Brücke.
  EN TP: a busy Paris crosswalk
  de TP: ein belebter Zebrastreifen in Paris
  EN FP: a crosswalk in the snow
  de FP: ein Zebrastreifen im Schnee
4587 | cyclist (noun): a person who rides a bicycle | loc: Radfahrer
  EN TS: No way! The cyclist is surprised.
  de TS: Echt jetzt?! Der Radfahrer ist überrascht.
  EN FS: No way! The cyclist is sleeping.
  de FS: Echt jetzt?! Der Radfahrer schläft.
  EN TP: a cyclist at a junction
  de TP: ein Radfahrer an einer Kreuzung
  EN FP: a cyclist at a race
  de FP: ein Radfahrer bei einem Rennen
4588 | traffic (noun): the vehicles and people moving along a place | loc: Verkehr
  EN TS: The traffic is stopped.
  de TS: Der Verkehr steht.
  EN FS: The traffic is moving.
  de FS: Der Verkehr fließt.
  EN TP: stopped traffic at night
  de TP: stehender Verkehr bei Nacht
  EN FP: heavy traffic in the day
  de FP: dichter Verkehr am Tag
4589 | pedestrian (noun): a person walking in the street, not driving | loc: Fußgänger
  EN TS: So many pedestrians!
  de TS: So viele Fußgänger!
  EN FS: So many cyclists!
  de FS: So viele Radfahrer!
  EN TP: pedestrians on a junction
  de TP: Fußgänger auf einer Kreuzung
  EN FP: a pedestrian zone with shops
  de FP: eine Fußgängerzone mit Läden
4590 | vacation (noun): leisure time away from work for rest or fun | loc: Urlaub
  EN TS: Vacation mode: big splash!
  de TS: Urlaub heißt: großer Platsch!
  EN FS: Vacation mode: long nap!
  de FS: Urlaub heißt: langes Nickerchen!
  EN TP: a vacation on a ship
  de TP: Urlaub auf einem Schiff
  EN FP: a vacation on a train
  de FP: Urlaub in einem Zug
4591 | ship (noun): a large vessel that carries passengers or goods | loc: Schiff
  EN TS: The ship offers a pool on the top deck.
  de TS: Das Schiff bietet einen Pool auf dem Oberdeck.
  EN FS: The ship offers a cinema on the top deck.
  de FS: Das Schiff bietet ein Kino auf dem Oberdeck.
  EN TP: a big passenger ship
  de TP: ein großes Passagierschiff
  EN FP: a big cargo ship
  de FP: ein großes Frachtschiff
4592 | foot (noun): the part of the leg below the ankle | loc: Fuß | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Wine made with feet. Tasty?
  de TS: Wein, mit Füßen gemacht. Lecker?
  EN FS: Beer made with feet. Tasty?
  de FS: Bier, mit Füßen gemacht. Lecker?
  EN TP: bare feet in grapes
  de TP: nackte Füße in Trauben
  EN FP: bare feet in the sand
  de FP: nackte Füße im Sand
4593 | hospital (noun): a health facility where patients get treatment | loc: Krankenhaus
  EN TS: He is walking in the hospital.
  de TS: Er geht durchs Krankenhaus.
  EN FS: He is running in the hospital.
  de FS: Er rennt durchs Krankenhaus.
  EN TP: a long hospital corridor
  de TP: ein langer Krankenhausflur
  EN FP: a hospital car park
  de FP: ein Krankenhausparkplatz
